



. • imriiiipriiliMilpili
mMM
UMiM
P0LAND~1944
"Don't be scared, son," the man whispered. "We'll be fine. If we stick
together, we'll be just fine."
But the boy was scared. And he knew that his father and mother were
too.
They had spent the night before in a cold, crowded boxcar. Now they
were being herded along with hundreds of other families through a
winding maze of tall barbed-wire fences. On the other side, thin faces
with shaved heads and sunken eyes—like skulls the boy had once
seen in a scary movie— stared back at him sadly. He noticed the
crude purple numbers tattooed on their bony arms, and he
couldn't keep from shivering—and not just because the cold rain had
soaked him to the skin.
He was actually glad that the stiff, black-helmeted soldiers kept him
moving. Wherever they were going, he did not want to stop here. But
then the line came to a halt and the tall, angry soldier at the front
began to bark out orders.
"What are they saying?" his mother gasped just as a soldier shoved
her forward with the butt of his rifle. The boy's father shouted
something back, but his voice was drowned out by the cries of the
crowd around them. The boy tried to stay close to his parents, but a
pair of rough gloved hands yanked him suddenly away.
"Aaaghhhl" he screamed as his feet were lifted off the ground.
"Mama! Papa!"
The boy struggled to break free, but the guards were too strong. He
saw his mother lunge after him, and saw the soldier hold her back.
The next thing he knew, a thick barbed-wire gate slammed shut in
front of his face, locking him and hundreds of other children away
from their screaming parents.
The boy clawed at the metal mesh between him and his parents and
screamed again imtil his face turned blue. He felt two soldiers grab
him by the
arms and start dragging him away. The boy clamped his eyes shut
and screamed again and again. He did not see the tall wire fence
begin to buckle toward him. But he did feel the soldiers who were
dragging him come to a stop.
Crrrreeeee . . . Grrrruuhhh . . . Like nails being pulled to a magnet,
the barbed-wire fence began to strain and stretch toward the boy.
The guards looked at each other, bewildered. It was as if some
invisible force was pulling him away. Then one of them got tired of
the tug-of-war. He grabbed the gun off his shoulder and slammed it
down on the boy's head.
" Uhh ..." The boy's thin body went limp, and the fence sprang back
into place. The guards dragged the boy away along with the rest of
the children.
MISSISSIPPI—THE NOT TOO DISTANT FUTURE
"First New York City ..." A teenage girl knelt on her bed and pointed
to a large map tacked to her bedroom wall. "Then Niagara Falls." She
moved her finger slowly upward. "Toronto ... Calgary... Up the
Canadian Rockies . . . And then it's only a few hundred miles to
Anchorage."
"Won't it be kinda cold?" the boy beside her asked.
"That's the point, stupid," she teased him. "Otherwise it wouldn't be
an adventure."
"Oh . . ."The boy leaned closer to her, inching his
arm around behind her back. "And when are you making this
journey?"
The girl looked down, suddenly bashful. "Uh, I don't know. After
school . . . before college."
She watched as the boy slid his finger slowly along her sleeve. "Uh,
David . . .," she said.
The boy smiled. "Marie."
"So, what do you want to do?"
"Oh, I don't know. . . ." He playfully raised his eyebrows. "What do
you want to do?"
The girl bit her lip. "I don't know," she answered. This boy-girl thing
was all new to her. The boy, however, seemed to know exactly what
to do. He cupped her face in his hands, and as she closed her eyes he
leaned over and—
''Aaaghhhl" The boy's eyes popped open as fiery bolts of pure energy
crackled between his lips and hers.
The girl pulled away in terror, but the boy's stiff, shocked body
continued to spark and twitch. By the time her parents rushed in
seconds later, the boy was almost dead.
"I—I didn't mean to . . .," the girl stammered as she watched her
father begin performing CPR. "I didn't . . ." Tearfully she backed into
a corner.
"Honey, what happened?" her mother asked. "What did you do?"
"Call an ambulance!" her father shouted.
But Marie stood motionless, tears streaming down her face. "I didn't
do anything."
jtliiiiipKiHiliiMiMMkiiHi*^^
WASHINGTON, D.C.-ONE YEAR LATER
The mood in the crowded Senate hearing room was tense—even
hostile—as it usually was when the subject was mutants. But the
expert testifying before the lawmakers was prepared.
"DNA," Jean Grey began. "It is the basic building block of evolution.
Changes in our DNA are the reason we have evolved from single-cell
organisms ... to Homo sapiens. " She nodded toward an animated
synopsis of human evolution playing on the large video screen
behind her.
"Within our DNA," the yoimg woman went on, "are the genes that
decide our physical characteristics—eye color, height, and so forth. When these active genes mutate,
we see changes in the body. These evolutionary changes are subtle
and normally take thousands of years. However, within each of us lie
not only the millions of genes which dictate our physical makeup, but
millions upon millions more whose purpose has been completely
unknown to us. These imused genes have traditionally been referred
to as junk DNA. In fact, over eighty percent of our genetic structure
is made up of this so-called junk DNA."
Jean took a breath and pushed a strand of long auburn hair behind
her ear. Now was the time to get to the real point of her lecture.
"In recent years," she explained, "and for reasons which are still a
mystery, we have seen this latent DNA in our bodies mutating. These
mutations manifest at puberty and are often triggered by periods of
heightened emotional stress. The new DNA strands caused by the
mutations are producing some"—she paused—"admittedly startling
results. In other words, this previously unused DNA is not junk DNA
at all— but rather a vast storehouse which contains the almost
limitless potential for human advancement."
Behind her, the animation on the video screen
showed a man performing all kinds of amazing feats: first he grew to
ten times his normal size; then he moved a chair across a floor using
only his mind; then he changed the color of his skin fi-om brown to
green.
"Ladies and gentlemen," Jean said, looking hopefully around at her
stone-faced audience, "we are now seeing the beginnings of another
stage of human evolution. Not a new race of creature to be feared,
but rather the opportunity to find advancement within us all. "
Senator Robert Kelly, the steely chairman of the hearing, looked
down on Jean Grey from his seat. "Thank you for the wonderful
cartoon, Ms. Grey," he said, nodding toward the TV screen. "It was
quite . . . educational." He smiled for the photographers at the back
of the room, then grinned up at the spectators in the balcony.
""However, it fails to address the larger issue—the issue that is the
focus of this hearing. Three words: Are mutants dangerous?"
The crowd in the balcony rumbled in agreement as the senator's aide
handed him a black folder full of documents.
Jean looked at him coolly. "Well, that is an unfair question, Senator
Kelly," she answered. "The wrong person behind the wheel of a car
can be dangerous."
"Well, we do license people to drive," Senator Kelly shot back.
"But not to live." Jean Grey's eyes lit up with passion. "Senator, it is a
fact that mutants who have revealed themselves pubhcly have been
met with fear, hostility . . . even violence. And it is because of that
ever-present hostility that I am urging the Senate to vote against
mutant registration. To force mutants to expose themselves will only
further subject them to imnecessary prejudice."
The senator's stern expression softened into a smile. That was just
what he had been waiting for her to say. ^'Expose themselves?" He
looked around the room as if to say to his audience, "/ told you so. "
Then he asked sharply, "What is it the mutant community has to
hide, I wonder, that makes them so afraid to identify themselves?"
Jean Grey raised her hand in protest. "I didn't say they—"
But the senator cut her off. "Let me show you what's being hidden,
Ms. Grey." He pulled a grainy enlarged photograph out of the folder
before him and held it up for the crowd to see. It showed what used
to be a car sitting on a freeway.
"This was taken by a state pohce officer in Secaucus, New Jersey," Kelly said, playing up to the restless crowd. "A man
in a minor altercation literally melted the car in front of him."
Jean Grey reached up toward the dais. "May I see that photo. Senator
—"
But the senator ignored her. "This is not an isolated incident, Ms.
Grey," he continued. Then he held up the whole folder. "I have here a
list of names. Identified mutants—living right here in the United
States."
A horrified gasp drifted down from the balcony.
"Senator Kelly—" Jean Grey tried to stop him from going any further.
But the senator was only getting started.
"Here's a girl in Illinois who can walk through walls," he said. "What
or who is going to stop her from walking into a bank vault? Or the
White House?" Then he gestured dramatically to the audience. "Or
their houses?"
The spectators grumbled their shared concern.
Jean Grey glared hotly at the senator. "You are not—" she began. But
neither he nor the crowd was listening to her. The senator had the
room wrapped around his finger, and he knew it.
"And there are even rumors, Ms. Grey"—^he
looked down at her smugly—"of mutants so powerful that they can
enter our minds and control our thoughts, taking away our Godgiven free will. Ms. Grey, Americans deserve the right to decide
whether they want their children to be in school with mutants. To be
taught by mutants . . ."
He paused and waved his folder in front of him like a fan. "You're a
schoolteacher yourself, are you not?" he asked her. "I would think
that the rights of parents and students alike should be of paramount
importance to you. Parents have a right to know the dangers to their
children. That's the purpose of registration."
"Mmm!"
"Umh-hmmm!"
The chamber echoed with grunts of agreement as Jean Grey's face
burned with her frustration. The senator had no idea what he was
saying—no idea what registration would mean to hundreds . . .
thousands of mutants ... mutants who just wanted to live their lives
like everybody else.
She reached out once again to ask to see the senator's folder.
''Senator Kelly" she called out angrily, raising her voice above the
din. The next thing they
knew, the folder was flying out of Kelly's hand and straight into
Jean's.
As soon as she realized what was happening, Jean quickly clamped
shut her fist. Instantly the folder dropped to the floor. She looked
down at the papers and photographs scattered before her. No one in
the room was quite sure what had just happened. But KeUy had a
pretty good idea.
"Ladies and gentlemen," he said, looking around the chamber, "the
truth is that mutants are very real." He turned to Jean. "They are
among us. We must know who they are. And above all, we must
know what they can do."
Jean scanned the crowd as low murmurs gave way to a roar of voices
—all in support of Senator Kelly and his plan. He had won. She hung
her head and sighed. Once again, her own mutant powers had
betrayed her. And mutant registration was closer than ever to
becoming a reality.
Meanwhile, in the rear of the Senate chamber. Professor Charles
Xavier hung his bald head in disappointment too. If the Kelly bill
went through, as it now seemed it would, Xavier's dream of mutants
and nonmutants living in peace and harmony would
be farther than ever from coming true. His hfe's work, and the work
of the young mutants like Jean Grey whom he had guided and
trained, would be set back indefinitely.
Burdened with this tragic weight, he slowly turned his motorized
wheelchair toward the door—just in time to see a dark figure slipping
out of the grand chamber. Professor X wheeled out after him, and
though the mysterious man's back was toward him, he seemed to
sense that Xavier was there. The man stopped midstride but did not
turn around.
"What are you doing here?" Professor X asked softly.
The man only half turned, but even in the shadows Professor X knew
all too well the strong, sad face of his old friend Eric Magnus
Lensherr . . . known to some as Magneto.
"Why do you ask questions to which you already know the answers?"
Magneto replied with a faint German accent.
Professor X shook his head. "Don't give up on them, Eric—"
"What would you have me do, Charles?" Magneto cut in. "I've heard
these arguments before."
Professor X knew that Magneto was referring to the Nazis who had
murdered his Gypsy family. "That was a long time ago," Xavier told
him. "Mankind has evolved since then."
Slowly Magneto turned completely so that Professor X could see his
ice-cold, pain-filled eyes. "Yes," he said, and paused. "Man has
evolved . . . into us."
The two men's gazes locked for a long moment. Then Magneto's
hand drifted up to rub his bearded chin. "Why are you sneaking
around in here, Charles?" he asked as his face softened. Then he
clenched his other hand into a fist, and the wheelchair beneath
Professor X suddenly jerked as if yanked by an invisible rope. "What
are you looking for?"
Professor X sat calmly, staring fearlessly into Magneto's eyes. "Hope,
Eric," he answered. "I'm looking for hope."
The other man sighed, and his fist opened slowly. Professor X's chair
rolled back just slightly, as if the force had let it go.
"I will bring you hope," Magneto said, sliding his hands into his
pockets. "And I ask only one thing in return." His dark eyes
narrowed. "Don't get in my way."
Professor X watched Magneto turn and start to walk away.
"We are the futurej" Magneto said as he moved down the hall. "Not
them. They no longer matter."
And with those simple words, the struggle between two of the world's
most powerful men had begun.
ALBERTA, CANADA—A FEW DAYS LATER
"What can I get you?" the bartender asked.
The man in jfront of him was unlike anyone he'd ever seen before.
His features were more animal-like than human. Deep, beady,
stalking eyes; a strong, bony, tooth-filled jaw; and that hair! Coarse
and black and sprouting wildly from his head—it looked like the back
of an angry wolverine. He puffed on a thick half-smoked cigar and
kept his eyes on the ashtray in front of him.
"Something on tap," the man said, almost growling.
The bartender nodded toward the long row of taps beside him.
"What would you like?"
"I don't care." The man let his eyes drift up to the dusty television on
the wall behind the bar.
'''Preparations are almost complete for the upcoming United Nations
World Summit" the stiff newscaster reported. "With nearly every
invitation confirmed, the event promises to be the largest single
gathering of world leaders in history.'^
The image on the screen shifted to a bird's-eye view of Elhs Island.
Behind it, the Statue of Liberty stood regally, holding up her torch.
"The leaders of over two hundred nations will discuss issues ranging
from the global economic climate and weapons treaties to the mutant
phenomenon and its impact on our world stage. . . .''
A growl rose from deep in the man's throat. "There anything else
on?" he asked gruffly.
The bartender shrugged and punched the remote control. A snowy
rerun of Designing Women noisily filled the screen. "Satellite's
busted," he explained. "Only got the two channels. This all right?"
"It's great," the man muttered, slumping lower on his barstool and
chomping down on his cigar.
Just then the man felt someone walk up and stand beside him. It was
a teenage girl—though she was so
covered in layers of odd clothing, from the shawl around her head to
her heavy black boots, that it took him a minute to figure that out.
From what he could see, she had the sad, desperate look of a
runaway. A look the man knew all too well.
"Listen, can you help me?" she asked in a low, panicky voice. She
shot a quick glance at a group of rowdy, drunken truckers gathered
around a table toward the back. Then her eyes moved back to his.
"Please. I was hitchhiking and these guys . . . they won't let me go. I
think they're gonna—"
"Hey." One of the truckers stood up and took a stumbling step
toward the bar. "I thought you were just going to the bathroom."
The girl stared at the man at the bar desperately. "Please," she
murmured.
"Come on, honey." The trucker came up and stretched a grimy hand
out to take her arm.
"Don't touch me!" she shouted, yanking her arm away. "I told you."
But he grabbed for her again. "I said come on—"
The girl flinched as the trucker's fingers came down on her hand.
There was a brief, bright flash, and the trucker's eyes and mouth
popped wide open. Then, with a heavy thud, he collapsed at the girl's
feet.
"Hank?"
The trucker's friends rushed over from their table and stared down at
their twitching friend.
"Get his head up!" one of them shouted. "Should I call an
ambulance?"
"You wanna tell me what happened?" another asked. He looked from
the man at the bar to the girl, who had quietly stepped behind him.
"I don't know," the man replied in a low monotone. He took another
slow puff on his cigar and looked away. He had enough problems of
his own; he was going to do his best to stay out of this one.
"What do you mean you don't know?" the trucker asked angrily. "My
buddy's on the floor over there."
The man shrugged. "Maybe he's sleepy. I don't know."
The trucker's eyes narrowed. Roughly he grabbed the back of the
man's shirt. "What, are you trying to be funny?" His rank-smelling
beer breath fell hot and heavy on the man's face. "Come on, just give
me an excuse to beat you up."
WHAM!
Without even turning, the man drove his elbow straight back and
into the trucker's face.
"That work for you?" the man asked as the trucker fell to his knees in
a daze.
But the trucker's buddies were on the man in an instant. They
grabbed him by the arms and held him while their friend got to his
feet and—^WHAM!— punched him in the nose. The blow, however,
seemed to take more out of the trucker's fist than it did the man's
face. He just grinned and shook his head.
The trucker wasn't through. He rubbed his fist and with a grunt
drove it into the man's gut. The man doubled over—but not in pain.
Still grirming, he looked up at the trucker, then reached down and
pushed his knuckles into the legs of the other two holding him.
SHOOK!
The sharp sound of sliding metal rang through the bar—quickly
followed by howls of pain from the two stumbling truckers.
"What happened?" asked the other one. "What happened!"
SHOOK!
Smoothly the man pulled his hands away, and the
two truckers fell in a smelly heap to the floor—each with three
punctures in his thigh. Then the man stood up and faced the trucker
who had punched him. On his face was the fierce, feral look of an
enraged animal.
Terrified, the trucker backed away. He grabbed a metal tray off the
bar and held it in front of his face like a shield.
SHOOK!
The man's fist shot out, and as it did, three steely nine-inch claws
emerged firom the skin above his knuckles. The sabers shced
through the thin tray like butter and carelessly flung it away. Then
the man grabbed the trucker's shirt and slammed him up against the
wall. He pulled his clawed fist back and, aiming straight for the
man's head, drove it forward.
THUNK!
Two gleaming claws pierced the wall on either side of the trucker's
terrified face, while the middle claw hovered, mercifully, just short of
his trembling throat.
The dark man's piercing eyes bored into the trucker's. "Run," he
muttered hoarsely, almost growling. Then he yanked his claws out of
the wall,
leaving two paper-thin streaks of blood along the sides of the man's
neck.
The trucker did not need to be told twice. He gulped for air and ran
for his life.
The man watched the trucker and his wounded buddies flee. Then he
turned back to the bar and the girl. She was nowhere to be seen.
Coldly he cast his eyes around the trashed, silent room. And with
heavy steps, he headed past the freaked-out bartender and out the
door.
Outside, the midwinter snowfall had whipped into a full-blown
storm. The man made his way to his beat-up camper, already axle-
deep in the powdery snow. An old trailer loaded with a cord of
firewood and a rusty, beat-up motorcycle were attached to the back.
With his thick-gloved hand, the man wiped a circle of snow off his
front windshield. Then he opened the door and climbed inside.
Darn, he thought as he gunned his engine. He'd left his cigar in the
bar. He pulled another one out of the pocket of his worn leather
jacket. He lit it as he drove away. He took a deep puff and slowly
blew it out . . . then sniffed the air.
The meager but noisy contents of the camper flew forward as the
man slammed hard on his brakes. The old truck fishtailed on the
slick, snow-covered highway—then finally slid to a halt at the foot of
a lone pine tree.
The man got out of his seat and made his way to the back of the
camper. He puffed on his cigar thoughtfully. His superhuman senses
told him there was something that wasn't supposed to be there.
"Get out," he said gruffly.
For a moment nothing happened. Then slowly the tarp covering the
trailer lifted and the girl from the bar guiltily peeked out.
"Where am I supposed to go?" she asked miserably.
The man stood in front of her with his hands on his hips, glaring. "I
don't know," he said with an irritated shrug. "Get out."
"You don't know," the girl challenged him as she climbed out of the
trailer, "or you don't care?"
"Pick one," the man said.
She bit her lip and nodded toward his knuckles. "How long have you
known?"
"Known what?" Logan said flady.
"That you had . . . that you were, you know, like me.
The man's jaw tensed. "I'm not like you."
The girl rolled her eyes. "Right, you're just a normal, everyday claw
guy—"
"What I am is none of your business. Now get out," the man said,
turning around and heading to the front of the camper.
The girl stared at him in disbelief. But the man obviously didn't care.
He watched her, stone-faced, as she heaved her dirty duffel bag onto
her shoulder.
As the snow fell wetly on her, the girl stood at the side of the cold,
empty road and watched the camper drive away. She'd been so sure
that guy would help her . . . would understand her, even. How could
she have been so wrong?
"What a jerk!" she said out loud.
Just as the trailer's red brake lights were starting to fade away, they
brightened and the camper stopped. The girl smiled. Maybe she had
spoken too soon.
Iggp_glpggpg^
A CANADIAN HIGHWAY—AN HOUR LATER
"So, what's your name?" the girl asked, finally trying to make
conversation.
"Lx)gan," he said gruffly, staring straight ahead. "What's yours?"
The girl opened her mouth, ready to tell him "Marie." But then she
changed her mind and closed it. That name—that world—was what
she was trying to escape. From now on, she had decided, things were
going to be different.
"Rogue," she said matter-of-factly.
The man was quiet for a moment. "What kind of name is Rogue?"
The girl flashed him an indignant look. "What kind of name is
Logan?" she shot back.
He shrugged and nodded. She had a point, he guessed.
"So." She spoke up again after another awkward silence. "How did
you get those—"
"Listen, kid," Logan said, cutting her off, "right now the only thing
you've done to endear yourself to me is get three big truckers to
attack me. That was kind of fun, so I'm cutting you some slack. But
any more chatter and the slack runs out."
Silence settled over them again. Rogue started poking around inside
the cab of the camper, picking up scraps of paper. After a few
minutes of this, Logan made a move to grab one of her hands. Rogue
recoiled.
"Don't!" she cried. "Don't touch me!"
"Hey, relax, kid," Logan said, pulling back. "I wasn't going to do
anything to you."
"It's not that," Rogue said. "But when people touch me, something
happens. . . . They just get hurt."
Logan stared at her for a moment, then turned back to face the
windshield.
Rogue sat quietly for a moment. She opened her mouth as if to speak,
then stopped. Finally she couldn't stand the silence any longer.
"You know," she said, unable to stop herself, "you should wear your
seat belt."
"What did I just tell you—" Logan growled.
CRASH!
The camper slammed to a halt and Logan went flying headfirst
through the windshield. As Rogue, safely seat-belted and shocked
but unhurt, watched, he rolled along the slushy road and to the edge
of a snow-covered cliff.
"Stupid road!" Logan shouted as he rose to his feet and shook the
snow out of his bushy hair.
Rogue stared at him through the shattered windshield and swirling
snow. She saw the deep, bloody gash running from his forehead to
his chin and winced.
"Your face—" she began.
But before she could say any more, the wound closed up and healed
completely. She stared at the man, stunned.
"Are you all right?" Logan asked.
Rogue nodded dumbly.
Logan looked down to inspect a huge tree lying across the road. Just
in front of the camper lay its freshly splintered base.
Logan gave the trunk a kick. Then—SCHWOP!— a massive clawed
hand shot out of a snowbank behind him and grabbed him by the
throat.
"Aagghhhhl" Rogue screamed as a huge yellow fur-covered thing
emerged from the snow. At first it looked to her like some kind of
giant bear ... or Sasquatch . . . But then she realized it was more like a
man . . . and like a cat. This was Sabretooth.
Rogue watched, feeling helpless, as the beast towered over Logan,
baring his knifelike fangs. Then with one fluid motion, Sabretooth
swooped Logan up in his claws, swung him around his head, and
tossed him into the snowdrift.
Rogue fought back another scream and tried to free herself from her
seat. But the crash had pinned her in. She struggled in vain—then
turned to see hot orange flames spreading from Logan's last cigar,
across a jumbled pile of clothes, toward the front of the camper.
"Aagghhhhf" she screamed again.
Meanwhile, Sabretooth had grabbed Logan once again and slammed
him, hard, into a tree. Logan
rolled to his feet and—SHOOK!—released both sets of claws. But
Sabretooth was ready for him. Deftly he grabbed Logan by the wrist
and whipped him around a full three-sixty before slamming him
back into the tree. Then he picked up the dazed Logan, raised him
over his head, and with a deep, angry growl, tossed him back through
the shattered windshield of the camper.
"Ughh!" Rogue grunted as Logan's limp body landed on her.
"Mister?" she gulped frantically. "Mister? Wake up, okay?"
Inside, the fire was practically upon them. Outside, all claws and
fangs, the beast Sabretooth stood snarling.
"Come on, come on, wake up, please . . ."
And then, suddenly, Sabretooth was not alone. A man wearing a
tight-fitting black suit, with a red mirrored visor across his eyes, and
a woman, also dressed all in black, with snow-white hair and dark
brown skin, stood behind him.
A low, rumbling growl rose from Sabretooth's throat as he turned
and charged at the pair.
But they held their ground. And with a blinding flash, the red crystal
visor that masked the man's eyes sent a red-hot beam of light
straight into Sabretooth's chest. The blast sent the beast back, roaring, into the woods.
And the snapping of trees breaking in his wake filled the air.
Wiping his hands, the man turned his head back toward the camper
and saw the flames getting closer by the second to the propane tank.
He dashed over to the vehicle and reached through the broken
windshield. With amazing strength and balance, he pulled Logan's
lifeless body off Rogue.
"Don't touch me!" she quickly warned as he reached in for her.
"Please, just help me with the seat. It's stuck." She struggled against
the crumpled metal. "I can't move my hands."
Behind the man with the red visor, the white-haired woman surveyed
the situation. Staring with great concentration, she let her clear blue
eyes turn as white as her hair. As she did, the wind began to blow
faster and swirls of snow began to dampen the flames.
"Hurry, Cyclops," she called. "I can't put out the fire completely."
Roughly Cyclops yanked open the camper door and stared at Rogue,
pinned in her seat. Suddenly a thin beam of light shot out of his
visor; the metal of the seat began to glow; then it collapsed and
Rogue
was freed. As she scrambled out. Storm pulled Logan off the hood
and laid him on the ground—just as the valve on the propane tank
blew off.
There was no time to run. The tank was going to blow—
"Storm!" Cyclops shouted.
The woman turned, eyes still white, away from the fire, and the wind
turned with her. A split second later, a hurricane-force gale hit the
group from behind, blasting them away from the camper like
matchsticks—and the propane tank exploded behind them.
KA-BOOM!
Later that evening, in his secret lair. Magneto drummed his fingers
impatiently on his metal desk.
"My instructions were simple," he said to the dimly lit figure
standing before him. "In fact, I made them that way especially for
you. And yet"—^he glared at Sabretooth—"you were unable to
retrieve our friend. What happened, brother?"
The hairy beast pulled furiously at the dog tag he now wore—the one
he'd ripped from Logan's neck during their fight.
"It was Xavier's people," he snarled. "They knew."
Magneto leaned back in his chair. "Ahh . . . Charles," he said
thoughtfully, more to himself than to his associate. "Good for you,
Charles." He probably shouldn't have been surprised, he mused, that
his old friend would try to stand in the way of his plans.
Then he raised his arm, revealing the still visible numbers tattooed
there, and put out a hand toward Sabretooth's chest. The dog tag
snapped off its chain and flew through the air to him.
Magneto read the word stamped at the bottom of the tag.
"'Wolverine'?" he murmured. "Hmmm . . . strange." He turned back
to Sabretooth. "Where is the mutant now?"
"With them," Sabretooth muttered.
Magneto nodded. "I have made the first move," he said. He spun the
tag once around his finger, then tossed it back at Sabretooth. "That is
all they know—because that is all you know."
"Come," he commanded, standing and making his way toward the
door. "We only have three days."
THE X-MANSION—THE NEXT MORNING
Jean Grey watched the httle box float down toward her from the lab
shelf and stretched out a hand to grab it. She opened the cardboard
lid and pulled out a sterile IV needle. She looked down at Lx)gan's
body lying on the metal table before her. Her eyes roamed from his
muscular bare shoulders to the three faint incision marks on the
back of his large, strong hand. Lightly she took hold of the hand and
began to stick the needle in—
SNAP!
The hand Jean was holding jerked up, breaking the needle, and
closed around her delicate neck. Unable to speak—or breathe—she watched as Logan's other hand, balled
into a tight fist, rose up in firont of her face. She stared back at him
as calmly as she could, and for what felt like an eternity, the two of
them locked eyes.
Then, just as suddenly, Logan turned away. He quickly scanned the
brightly lit room, and seeing that they were alone, he let go of Jean's
throat and leaped off the exam table. Jean grabbed her burning neck
and gasped for air as Logan dashed across the gleaming laboratory
floor and tlirough the door.
In the hall, Logan yanked the broken needle out of the back of his
hand. Not knowing which way to go, he dashed through the first door
he came to. He found himself in some sort of futuristic locker room.
Gleaming metal lockers lined one side of the room, and brightly lit
cubbyholes—almost like display cases—lined the other. Head
throbbing and insides aching, Logan stared at the sleek uniforms
hanging in each of the cases—the same kind of tight black suit the
pair on the road had been wearing. Then he turned back to the
lockers.
He yanked open one door after another and rummaged through their
contents until he found something to replace the thin hospital gown
he was
wearing. The pants were a little short, and the shirt was thin for the
winter weather, but they would have to do. As he buttoned the shirt,
Logan's ears pricked at the sound of footsteps in the hallway. He had
to keep moving. He spotted another door at the other end of the
room and hurried toward it. He found himself in another blindingly
white hallway. But this one had an elevator at the end.
BING!
The heavy chrome elevator doors slid open, and Logan made a dash
for them. He took a deep breath while he watched them close and
wondered where the elevator would take him.
The elevator doors opened, and Logan stepped back, bewildered. The
scene before him was the exact opposite of the sleek, modern place
he'd left. Carved mahogany moldings . . . plush Oriental carpeting ...
oil paintings in gilded frames . . . He had thought he was in some
kind of scientific facility. But this looked like a mansion.
The sound of a woman's voice drifted out to him from a not too
distant room.
"The Roman Empire. For centuries, they persecuted and ostracized
the Christians to the extent that they were fed to lions for sport.
Then, almost
overnight, their religion rose to become the dominant faith in the
empire."
Logan walked slowly toward the open door and peered around the
frame. There was the striking dark-skinned woman he had seen in
Canada. Today she was dressed in normal street clothes, like any
other woman—but he would have recognized that long mane of white
hair anywhere.
She was standing before a group of average-looking teenagers—
average-looking at first. But the more Logan stared at them, the
more he realized that there was something special—something
mutant —about each one.
"Does anyone know what caused the Christians to suddenly become
accepted?" the woman asked the class.
A tall boy with a knit hat pulled low over his head raised his hand.
"Yes?"
"The emperor suddenly became one?"
She nodded. "That's right. Which made for some very relieved
Christians, I can tell you." She paused and turned toward the door.
"Can I help you?" she asked Logan.
Immediately every pair of eyes in the room turned to stare at the
man with shaggy hair and high-water pants. And as a low snicker
spread through the class, Logan ducked back into the hall and
hurried away.
He rounded a corner and soon spotted another door. This one was
closed, but he heard voices and footsteps coming at him from both
directions. He lunged for the heavy brass doorknob and turned it.
"Good morning, Logan," said a warm voice.
Logan opened his eyes. He'd almost thought he'd gotten away. But he
was not alone. In front of him, behind a large mahogany desk, sat a
distinguished-looking bald man. With him were four young students
whom he was apparently tutoring.
The man smiled at Logan and held up a finger, asking him to wait.
"Well, I think that's enough for today, don't you?" he told his
students. "Off you go."
Obediently the teenagers stood up and filed past Logan, staring at
him as they walked by.
"Kitty ...," the man behind the desk called to one of the departing
girls. He waved his hand at the desktop.
"Oops," said the girl, stopping just inside the door.
She let the last boy close the door behind him and ran back to the
mahogany desk. She grabbed the book she'd forgotten and turned to
go again.
"Bye, Professor Xavier," Kitty called sweetly over her shoulder. And
ignoring Logan this time, she left the office—walking through the
closed oak door.
The professor held up a textbook and waved it at Logan. "Physics,"
he said with a grin, as if that explained everything. "Would you like
some breakfast?"
Logan ran his hand through his wild, wiry hair. "Where am I?" he
asked miserably.
"Westchester, New York," his host answered simply. "You were
attacked. My people brought you here for medical attention."
"I don't need medical attention," Logan grimi-bled, shaking his head.
Professor X smiled and leaned back. "Yes ... of course."
He lifted his hand and set it down on a pad on the arm of his chair.
And as he slowly rolled back, Logan realized for the first time that
the man was in a motorized wheelchair.
"I'm sorry," the man said as he wheeled around the desk. "Allow me
to introduce myself. I am Professor Charles Xavier."
At that moment the door of the professor's office opened and in
walked Jean Grey, the white-haired woman, and the man who'd
pulled Logan out of the camper. And with them was Rogue.
"Ah, thank you." The professor smiled and held out his hands. "Dr.
Grey, allow me to introduce Logan."
"Yes." Jean rubbed her throat and nodded. "We just met." Then she
smiled and offered her hand.
Logan stared into her soft green eyes. She was easily the most
beautiful woman he had ever seen. But Logan wasn't in the mood for
making new friends or polite conversation. His jaw remained
clamped shut and his arms stayed firmly at his sides.
"And," Professor X continued, motioning toward the others, "Ororo
Munroe—also called Storm. And Scott Summers—also called
Cyclops."
Like the white-haired woman, the man was now dressed in regular
street clothes—dark pants and a turtleneck sweater. His eyes,
however, were still covered by a visor.
Logan glanced at them briefly but said nothing. Then he turned his
attention to Rogue.
"Don't mention it," Cyclops said, annoyed.
Out of the corner of his eye, Logan saw Jean put
out a hand and lay it gently on the man's arm. It was clearly the act of
a girl telling her boyfriend to relax. And the fact that Jean and this
bozo were a couple bothered Logan more than he cared to admit. But
he had other concerns at the moment.
"What are you going to do with her?" he asked Professor X, nodding
in Rogue's direction.
Professor X turned toward Rogue, and an expression of warm
understanding spread across his face— as if he could feel her pain,
her struggle. As if he could read her mind.
"Rogue's been on her own for months now," he said slowly,
"searching for a home. A place to belong." He turned to Logan.
"We're going to give her that."
Professor X gestured to the walls aroimd him. "This is my school for
the gifted ... for mutants. You'll both be safe here until we can decide
what Magneto wants."
Logan stared back at him blankly. "What's a Magneto?"
The professor raised his eyebrows. "A very powerful mutant who
believes that there is a war brewing between us and the rest of
humanity."
"So?" Logan grunted, his eyes getting narrower. "What does that
have to do with me?"
Professor X rubbed his hands together. "I don't know yet," he
rephed. "But I believe Magneto is planning some kind of preemptive
strike. I've been following his actions for some time. The mutant that
attacked you is an associate of Magneto's called Sabretooth. I tracked
him. He led me to you." His thoughtful eyes focused on Logan's. "We
need to keep you out of Magneto's reach until we know what his
interest is."
Logan held up his hand. He had heard enough. "Sorry, pal," he said,
"I have to get back to—"
Whit a second. What did he have to get back to? Where was his
camper?
"It's gone," Professor X said, interrupting his thoughts.
Logan looked at him.
"Your truck was destroyed," the professor went on. "A fire ignited the
propane tank. There was nothing left."
Logan shook his head. Nothing left. But that was all he had.
The professor rolled a little closer. "Logan, it's been almost fifteen
years, hasn't it?" he said. "Since you woke up."
Logan stared back at him in shock.
"No knowledge of who you really are . . . ," Professor X went on.
"Living day to day . . . Trying to piece together what happened to you
. . ." His voice became gentler. "You know how to fight, though.
You've always known, haven't you? And your nightmares . . . Vague
clues to a past that's all but extinct . . . Erased . . . And now
everything you own has been destroyed. Where exactly will you go?"
"How do you know all that?" Logan asked, sturmed.
'"You're not the only one zvith gifts" the professor's voice answered.
But Logan was sure the man's lips hadn't moved. The voice Logan
had heard had been Professor X's—^but he'd heard it inside his own
head.
Logan curled his lip. "So this is like a dog pound for unwanted
mutants, is that it?"
"It's a school," Cyclops cut in.
Logan flashed the man a dark warning look, then turned back to
Professor X. "You know, I don't really know what you're asking me
here, but—lucky for me—^I don't care." He smiled dryly and took a
step toward the door. "Thanks for the ride," he said, waving.
"Hold on—" Cyclops said, mo>«^ to block Logan's way.
Professor X spoke up. "Logan, I'll make you a
deal," he said. "You give me forty-eight hours to figure out what
Magneto wants with you, and I give you my word that, no matter
what happens, I'll use all my power to help you piece together what
you've lost . . . and what you're looking for."
Slowly Logan turned to look at him.
"Forty-eight hours, old man," he warned, glaring. "Cross me, and I
won't feel any guilt about what I do to you."
3iitifjWii»yii)iM>|iM»M«i^ftifm^^ ,
THE X-MANSION—LATER THAT DAY
While Rogue began her first day of classes. Professor X led Logan on
a tour of the X-Mansion—Logan's home for the next forty-eight
hours.
"The dining rooms, kitchen, and parlor are found in the other wing,"
the professor said, pointing toward a long carpeted hallway. "As you
can see, everything on this floor and above has been designed to be
viewed by the general public. As far as they know, this is merely a
school for gifted students."
He stopped his wheelchair in front of a pair of carved wood elevator
doors and waited for them to
slide open. He nodded for Logan to enter first, then rolled in behind
him.
"The subbasementSj however," he continued as the doors began to
close, "are an entirely different matter."
When the doors slid open again, Logan found himself in the same
futuristic fluorescent-lit setting he had fled from earlier.
"How did I get here?" he grunted as the professor wheeled his chair
into the hall.
"Come," the doctor rephed, "I'll show you."
He led Logan down a stark white corridor and through several round
automated doors, until at last they reached an enormous steel-walled
room. It reminded Logan of the inside of a giant safe—only instead of
piles of money, this vault held one gleaming black, lightning-fastlooking jet.
"The X-Jet," the professor said simply.
Impressed, Logan walked up to the plane as a faint thumping sound
drifted down around him from the ceiling.
Thump, thump-thump, thump.
It took him a second to realize that it was the sound of a basketball
game being played on the gym floor above.
Meanwhile, Professor X had rolled up beside him.
"Everybody here has abilities," he told Logan. "Powers. Curses until
they can be controlled." He looked up into the younger man's eyes.
"All of us have hurt and been hurt. None of us asked to be the way we
are. When I was fifteen years old, I began to hear people's thoughts.
At first I thought I was going mad."
Professor X paused and shook his head as he remembered. "I was
terrified," he went on. "I withdrew for fear of harming anyone else. I
thought I was alone. Until I met Eric Lensherr. Eric too had a power.
He could create magnetic fields, enabling him to manipulate metal.
He helped me to understand what I was. And to find ways of
controlling my power. Eric also showed me that there were others
like us. But as our numbers increased, so did prejudice and fear. Our
world changed. And Eric changed with it. He believed that humanity
would never accept us. That a war between humans and mutants was
inevitable. He was angry, vengeful. That's when he became
Magneto."
Logan looked down at the doctor and nodded, waiting for him to go
on.
"No longer willing to follow Eric's example," Professor X continued,
"I opened this school." He held
SI
out his arms. "To be a place where mutants could be safe from
persecution. A place where they could not only learn to focus their
powers, but also learn that mankind is not evil, just uninformed."
Logan chuckled skeptically. Then he reached out and laid his hand
on the smooth metal skin of the jet. "That doesn't explain all the
hardware," he said as he gave it a pat.
The professor smiled. "There are mutants out there with incredible
power, Logan," he replied. "I knew that a day would come when
some of them might use that power against the rest of humanity. And
that if there was no one to challenge them . . . humanity's days could
end." He paused, and his eyes grew serious and faraway. " 'Evil men
succeed when good men do nothing.' It's something Eric once told
me." Then he blinked and turned back to his guest. "Now, if you
don't mind, Dr. Grey would like to examine you."
Dr. Grey . . . Logan shrugged and motioned for Professor X to lead
on. For once, he didn't mind obeying his host's request.
Meanwhile, several stories above. Rogue closed her new science
textbook. At the front of the classroom.
Storm was ending the afternoon's lesson on the finer points of
thunder and lightning.
"Class dismissed," she said brightly as the room filled with the noise
of slamming books and scraping chairs.
"So!" said a blond girl, turning breathlessly to Rogue, "that guy you
came in with? He's really got steel claws that come out of his hands?"
"No way!" exclaimed another girl, sitting on Rogue's other side.
"What kind of mutation is that?"
Rogue shrugged. Then a tiny orange flame a few desks in front of her
suddenly caught her eye. She looked up from the flame and the
lighter that had made it... to the tanned hand holding it.. . and the
smiling face of its handsome owner. As she stared, he pulled the
lighter away, but the flame stayed in place. Then, before her
astonished face, it grew into a ball the size of a fiery grapefruit. The
boy winked.
Just as quickly as the fireball had appeared, a ball of ice landed on
top of it, extinguishing it. Another cute boy grinned at Rogue and her
new friends. Then he began to wave his hand. Suddenly, a rose made
of ice appeared between his fingers. With a bow, he presented it to
Rogue.
"John? Bobby?" Storm called, her hands on her
hips. "Don't the two of you have another class to go to? And what did
I tell you about showing off?"
"Sorry," the boys said, gathering their books quickly.
Then, while the rest of the class filed out. Storm walked over to
Rogue's desk and sat down beside her.
"So?" she asked warmly. "How are you doing?"
Rogue looked around her in wonder. "This place . . . it's beautiful.
And everyone's so nice. I just. . ." She stopped and looked down at
her hands.
"How long have you been on your own. Rogue?" Storm asked quietly.
"Eight months," Rogue answered. "I've just been hitchhiking, trying
to get as far away from ... home as possible. I didn't know there was
any place for"—she paused—"us to go. But this . . ." She looked
around once more. "I've just... I've felt... kind of alone, you know?"
She gazed into Storm's sapphire eyes.
Storm smiled. "Well, you're not alone anymore," she told Rogue.
"And the professor . . ." Rogue smiled back at her hopefully. "I mean
... it works? He can actually cure me?"
Storm's smile faded. Cure? She bit her lip. The poor girl, she thought.
She still has so much to learn.
At the same time. Senator Kelly had left the Capitol and was on his
way by helicopter back to his home state.
Leaning back in his leather seat, he closed his cell phone and poured
himself a generous glass of scotch.
"So what was his opinion?" his longtime aide Henry Guyrich asked
him.
Kelly rolled his eyes. "He's the President of the United States," he
answered. "He doesn't have an opinion. He smiles. He waves. He
shakes hands." Kelly laughed.
"Isn't that what you do, sir?" his aide asked.
Kelly stopped laughing and frowned at Guyrich. "Well, this time it's
not up to him, it's up to Congress," he snapped. Then he took a long
swig from his glass.
Guyrich looked at him closely. "Have you thought of a demonstration
of some kind? Maybe use the UN summit to our advantage. The
whole world will be watching."
Kelly shook his head. "I'm interested in Americans, Henry. Let the
rest of the world deal with muss
tants in their own way." Then he looked at his drink thoughtfully.
"You know, this is the sort of problem that liberals just beg you to
ignore—until it crawls up and bites them in the ass. And guys like us
are left to clean it up." He turned to look out the window. "This
situation . . . these mutants . . . are the reason people like me exist... .
Hey, where the hell are we?"
Below them was nothing but a choppy gray-blue ocean.
"Hen—" Kelly turned back to speak to Guyrich. Then he stopped and
screamed.
"Aaahr
Where his aide had sat, Kelly now saw a beautiful woman covered in
shimmering green-blue scales. Her snakelike yellow eyes glowed
with evil glee as she smiled back at the terrified senator. And she
laughed as she watched him bolt for the cockpit door.
"Pilot. Pilotr he cried.
But the figure at the controls paid him no attention. Kelly turned
back to the mysterious woman and cried out again in terror as she
moved closer.
"Aggghhhf"
Kelly swung his fist at her vicious, grinning face. But he might as well
have been moving in slow motion. She caught his hand and hit him with a rapid and comphcated
combination of karate kicks and punches.
"You know," the woman whispered as she wound up for a final blow,
"people like you are the reason I was afraid to go to school as a
child."
Then she let her fist go and watched him slump to the floor,
unconscious.
THE X-MANSION—LATER THAT AFTERNOON
Back at the X-Mansion, Jean Grey showed Logan to his small but
comfortable room. She stood back and watched as he went in and
began to inspect the room and all its furnishings.
"A lot of mutants leave pretty ugly situations behind them," she said.
"People find out what you are, and . . ." She paused. "A lot of them
just start over with a new identity."
"And you move things with your brain, right?" Logan flashed a quick
look at Jean, then moved to a stack of clothes that had apparently
been set out for him.
"It's called telekinesis," Jean told him.
"Right," Logan said as he made a pile of the few clothes he liked and
pushed the others aside.
Jean stood there, knowing that she really should leave. But somehow
she also wanted to impress Logan with her powers. "I also have some
. .. telepathic ability," she told him.
"Like the professor?"
Jean shook her head. "My telepathy is nowhere near as powerful as
Professor Xavier's. But sometimes, if I make a strong enough
connection—"
"So, are you just . . . Jean Grey?" Logan broke in.
"What do you mean?"
Logan shrugged. "I mean, are you Mrs. Cyclops?" he teased. "You
guys are a couple, right?"
Jean smiled somewhat self-consciously, but she didn't answer.
"He seems kinda . . . tense," Logan said, sitting down and giving the
mattress a rough bounce. "For a woman like you, I mean."
Jean raised her eyebrows. "Is that so?"
Logan shrugged again. That was just the way he saw it.
Jean took a step toward him, her face serious this time. "When
Professor Xavier found Scott, he hadn't opened his eyes in two
months. Awake,
asleep— even with the visor, it's very hard to control the energy.
Without it, if he opened his eyes, he could punch through a mountain
as easily as you would crush a beer can. He has to be in control, every
minute of every day."
Logan looked at her quietly, taking in her refined and sincere face.
He had a feeling about her that he just couldn't shake. A feeling he'd
never had before. A feeling he didn't want to let jealousy get in the
way of.
"I'm sorry," he said sofdy.
"For what?"
He nodded at the bruises on her delicate throat. They were the marks
from when he'd grabbed her before. "If I hurt you," he said.
Jean looked into Logan's eyes, touched by this gentle side of him. She
reached up to touch his face. They gazed at each other for a long
moment—then Jean jerked back, pale and shaken.
"What do you see?" Logan asked, leaning forward intensely and
grasping her hand.
Jean stepped back uneasily. "Just . . . images," she gulped, still trying
to sort through the pictures that had just torn through her mind.
"Pain . . . What happened to you?"
n
Logan shook his head and looked down at her hand, which he still
held. "Bad things, darlin'... bad things."
"Isn't it past your bedtime, Logan?"
A deep voice suddenly sounded behind them. Jean quickly pulled her
hand from Logan's as together they turned to see Cyclops standing
just outside the door.
"Or did you want Jean to tell you a story?" he went on. Though his
eyes were covered, it was clear that he was annoyed.
Logan glared back. His gentle side had clearly disappeared. "I bet
she's got a few you haven't heard," he snapped back.
Standing beside him, Jean Grey sighed. Then she gave Cyclops a
weary look. "Let me know when you two start butting antlers," she
said as she headed toward the door. "'Cause I'll get my camera." She
edged past Cyclops and left the two men to whatever stupid macho
stuff they had to prove.
Logan silently watched her go, then stood up, face-to-face with
Cyclops.
"You gonna tell me to stay away from your girl?" he taxmted.
"If I had to do that, she wouldn't be my girl," Cyclops said smugly.
Then he looked Logan up and down. "Rogue said you were like an
animal in that bar," he told Logan. "I think she meant it as a
compliment; she was very impressed. But fighting humans is very
different from taking on mutants. Especially Magneto."
"You've fought him?" asked Logan.
Cyclops shook his head. "We haven't had to resort to that yet."
Logan rolled his eyes and laughed. "You're prep-ping for a war and
I'm not convinced you could handle yourself in a heated discussion.
I'm guessing rm the only one here who's seen any real combat."
"And when was that?" asked Cyclops.
Logan's jaw tensed and his eyes grew dark. "Previously."
"Don't like to talk about your past," said Cyclops.
"Not to you."
Cyclops put his hands on his waist and smiled. "It must just kill you
that I saved your life."
Logan looked away without responding.
"Don't worry," Cyclops told him as he turned and
headed out the door. "It won't happen again." Then he spun to face
Logan once more. "And Logan?" he began.
Logan stared back at him coldly.
"Stay away from my girl."
Then he left. And Logan smiled.
Later that night in the X-Laboratory, Jean stood in front of a glowing
light board that covered half the wall. On it were dozens of X rays,
each showing a different view of Logan's skeleton. But it was like no
skeleton Jean had ever seen before. Streamlined, refined ... it looked
more manmade than natural.
Behind her, Cyclops, Storm, and Professor X looked on as she
pointed to the pictures and told them what she had discovered.
"The metal is an alloy called adamantium," she explained. "Until
today, I thought it was a myth. Impenetrable, unbreakable.
Supposedly indestructible."
She tapped her finger on a large X ray in the center. "Somehow, it's
been surgically grafted to his entire skeleton."
"How could he have survived a procedure hke that?" Storm asked.
"His mutation," Jean said simply. "He had uncharted regenerative
capability, which enables him to heal rapidly. This also makes his age
impossible to determine. He could very well be older than you.
Professor." Jean glanced back at Xavier playfully.
Professor X grinned as Cyclops raised his hand. "Who did this to
him?" Cyclops asked.
The professor turned to Cyclops, about to answer. But to his surprise,
Jean spoke up first.
"He doesn't know," she said. "Nor does he remember anything about
his life before it happened."
Professor X sighed. "Experimentation on mutants . . ." He shook his
head. "It's not entirely im-heard of, but I've never seen anything like
this before."
"What do you think Magneto wants with him?" Cyclops asked.
Xavier stared thoughtfully at the X rays before answering. "I'm not
entirely sure," he said, "it's him that Magneto wants."
•6
Later that night. Senator Kelly woke up to find himself strapped
tightly to a hard metal chair.
He struggled for a minute against the iron bands holding his wrists.
Then too sore and bruised to fight anymore, he gave up and looked
helplessly at the dark bearded man in front of him.
"You . . . wha . . .Who are you . . .Where is Henry?"
Magneto gazed down at him. "Mr. Guyrich has been dead for some
time. Senator," he said. Then he smiled cruelly. "But I've had
Mystique here keep you company."
As he spoke, the blue-scaled Mystique slipped into view. She
wrapped her shapely arm around Magneto and laughed.
"Whatever you do to me," Kelly shouted at them, "you'll only make
me right. Every word I've spoken will be confirmed!"
"Gosh," said Magneto, his smile growing wider, "I hope so." He
paused for a moment and leaned over the senator. "Are you a Godfearing man, Senator?" he asked.
Kelly said nothing. But the look in his eyes told Magneto he was
certainly afraid of something.
"Such a strange phrase," Magneto mused. "I've
always thought of God as a teacher. As a bringer of light, wisdom . . .
and understanding."
He grinned as Kelly's eyes darted all around him, wild and terrified.
"You see," Magneto went on, "I think what you really are afiraid of ...
is me. Me and my kind. The Brotherhood of Mutants."
Then the Master of Magnetism turned and began walking down a
long, narrow platform—and suddenly the metal chair beneath Kelly
began to follow.
"Oh, it's not surprising, really," Magneto went on as Kelly scraped
along behind him. "Mankind has always feared what it doesn't
imderstand. And mankind has always made laws to protect itself
from what it doesn't understand. Laws like your Mutant Registration
Act."
Kelly strained once more against his immovable bonds. "The
intention of the registration act—" he began.
"Intention!" Magneto exclaimed, spinning around to face him.
''Intention, Senator? We are not talking about intentions. We are
talking about mankind. Its fear. And trust me when I tell you, it is
only a maner of time before mutants will be herded into camps.
Studied for weaknesses. And eventually wiped off the face of the
earth."
Kelly shook his head, speechless before Magneto's fury. Then he
watched as the villain moved toward him and stretched out a bony
hand to touch his face. The senator cringed, and Magneto smiled a
cold, cruel smile. Then he casually waved his hand, and with a
SHHRRUMMM of surging power, a bank of bright floodlights came
on.
Kelly's eyes slammed shut. Then they slowly opened again, and Kelly
could finally see exactly where he was. It was a clearing of some sort,
surrounded by enormous pine trees and huge cliff walls that formed
a kind of natural amphitheater. But right in firont of Kelly was
something absolutely not natural—a tremendous machine, more
than four stories high, made up of a huge, six-posted pedestal
supporting a giant metal ring.
"Don't fear God, Senator," Magneto said sofdy as he turned and
started once more toward the machine. "And certainly—most
certainly—don't fear me . . . not anymore."
Kelly looked down as his chair began to slide across the platform
again. "What is it you intend to do to me?" he asked nervously.
Magneto grinned. "Let's just say, God works too slowly." He stepped
into the base of the machine and placed his hands on two metal posts
beside him. Instantly his internal magnetic force locked his hands in
place. With a low, steady hum, the platform beneath him lifted him
into the center of the giant ring.
Slowly at first, then faster and faster, the ring began to spin as waves
of magnetic energy poured firom Magneto's hands. Finally the ring
was spinning so fast, it wasn't even visible—just a big silver blur
aroimd Magneto's arching, straining body. Finally, as Kelly watched,
eyes wide with fear, the spinning ring began to glow. It was dull at
first but soon became brighter and brighter—until at last it was too
bright to look at. Kelly turned away, but not before he had caught a
glimpse of Magneto's agonized face.
Suddenly the deafening whine of the machine stopped. Kelly glanced
up and to his horror saw that the glowing sphere had vanished. In its
place was a light so thick and white, it seemed to ooze rather than
radiate. It was like liquid light. And it spread out firom the machine
in a creeping, unstoppable wave.
Kelly clenched his teeth as the light washed over
him, the trees around him, and everything else in sight. Then in a
single, intense burst of pure energy—BAM!—it was suddenly gone.
"Oh ... oh, God!" Kelly cried out as he looked down at his glistening,
now almost glowing hands. "What have you done to me?"
Breathless and drained of a good deal of his power. Magneto stepped
out of the machine and stumbled to the senator's side.
"Welcome to the future," he whispered hoarsely in Kelly's ear,"...
brother."
THE X-MANSION—LATER THAT NIGHT
In his bed, Logan tossed and turned. He was asleep but tortured by
the same painful dreams that haunted him every night. Dreams of
his past . . . dreams that were all too real.
"Ohhh ..."
He let out a low groan as the door of his room slowly opened. A dim
yellow light shced through the darkness, but Logan didn't wake up—
not even when Rogue sofdy whispered his name and stepped inside.
She tiptoed to his bedside and stared down at him for a moment.
n
"Lx)gan?" she whispered again. But his sleep was deep and heavy.
That was okay with her. She didn't need to talk. She just didn't want
to be alone. She curled up in a big round chair next to Logan's bed
and closed her eyes.
She had no idea, of course, of the terrifying images going through
Logan's head . . . images of being trapped somewhere ... he was
running down corridors ... he knew it was some kind of military base
. . . but he didn't know why he was there ... he just knew he had to get
away . . . but each turn left him facing another empty corridor ...
another blank wall . . . another dead end. ...
"Aaaghhhf"
The room was suddenly filled with unbearable, piercing screams.
Rogue jumped up, wide awake, and rushed to the side of Logan's
bed. She leaned over to try to calm him—^but all Logan sensed as his
eyes flew open was that a body was coming toward him. In a flash, he
reacted . . . and the room was silent.
"What is it?" Cyclops shouted as he burst into the room.
Jean Grey and Storm were right behind him. But
when they saw what had just happened, they could only stand and
stare.
Logan's razor-sharp claws were fully extended, and the right set had
passed like a skewer through Rogue's shoulder and was sticking out
of her back. She was pinned, frozen on the end of his fist.
Finally Cyclops broke the silence and stepped awkwardly forward.
"Don't touch her!" Storm called out. "If she moves it could be worse!"
But Rogue did not look panicked. In fact, she looked calm. Gently she
reached up and touched Logan's face with her bare hand. And for a
second the two shared a look of loneliness and tenderness that only
they could understand.
In the next second, Logan was frozen as if by electric shock. His body
went rigid and his claws slid smoothly out of Rogue's shoulder and
back into his fists. As the others watched, stunned, Rogue's body
snapped back and her mouth fell open into a gaping, silent scream . .
. and the wounds left by Logan's claws vanished before their eyes.
Minutes later. Rogue stood before them, once again a healthy, whole
young girl. But Logan was
drained. Rogue stared down at Logan lying on the bed, then turned
and bolted out of the room.
"Wait, Rogue," Storm called, hurrying to catch her.
Jean bent down to check on Logan while Scott stood close to her,
watching. Logan moaned in pain.
"What.. . what did . . ." Logan tried to speak, but the effort was too
much for him, and he passed out from the pain.
Later that evening. Professor X joined Jean and Logan in Logan's
room.
''You're perfectly safe now," his deep, reassuring voice told Logan.
But it was Logan's mind, not his ears, that heard it.
"Now, I want you to stay calm and tell me if you understand what I'm
saying."
Logan lay on his bed and looked back at Professor X weakly.
"Do you understand me?" the voice asked again.
"Get out of my head, cue ball," Logan grunted.
Professor X smiled. "Well, I'd say you're recovering," he joked out
loud.
"How's the kid? Is she okay?" Logan asked.
"Rogue will be fine/' the professor said. "She's a little shaken up at
the moment, but she'll be all right. This has been very difficult for
her. She has an amazing, and frightening, gift. In time she'll learn
how to control it, but for now she just needs some peace and quiet
and understanding."
With difficulty Logan propped himself up on his elbows. "What did
she do to me?" he asked the professor.
"She borrowed your power," Jean answered.
"Pardon me?"
Professor X pressed his palms together in front of him. "Rogue is like
a conductor," he explained. "Any physical contact with a human
being can cause unconsciousness, seizures, even death. With
mutants, she's able to take on their gifts for a short time. In this case
—^your ability to heal."
Logan rubbed his hand over his face. "I feel like she almost killed
me," he groaned.
Xavier nodded grimly. "If she'd held on any longer, she would have."
Then he rested his hand on the keypad arm of his wheelchair. "You
should get some sleep," he told Logan as he began to wheel away.
Jean started to follow him, but Logan grabbed her hand before she
could go. "You know, I'd sleep better if you stayed with me," he told
her.
Jean smiled and shook her head. "Somehow I doubt that," she said.
"Good night, Logan." Then she got up and left the room, closing the
door gently behind her.
Meanwhile, Magneto had moved his "guest," Senator Kelly, to his
own private room—a dark, cavernous cell with two barred windows
but no real door . . . just a vast, bottomless chasm between it and the
rest of Magneto's lair.
Kelly paced back and forth between the window that overlooked the
dark, whistling, doom-filled pit, and the other one, which looked out
on the cold, moonlit sea. Groaning, he leaned heavily on the bars and
gazed out at the black water—then jimiped at the click-clack of
footsteps making their way toward his cell. He swallowed a thick,
hard lump of fear and desperately pressed his face once more against
the hard metal bars.
As much to his surprise as to his relief, he heard

Logan loses his temper and shows his claws.
Cyclops, the leader of the X-Men.
^abretooth has the upper hand over Storm.
The X-Men must find
Jean Grey before
Magneto does!
Will Jean Grey use her powers -^
fo** aoorl np mril t-h!
evil Magn wu recru
f ♦//
.v> .
Mystique, a shape-shifter who follows Magneto's orders.
'imft
the dull crack of his skull being flattened and felt the sharp,
throbbing pain of his head being squeezed through the iron bars.
The senator gasped from the pain—and the shock—^but he
continued to push. Shoulders, then ribs, then pelvis ... his bones
snapped and popped like undercooked spaghetti. But after a few
agonizing minutes, Kelly found himself dangling a thousand feet over
the ocean, outside his prison.
He looked down at his flattened chest as it began to expand back to
its normal size and shape with a hideous crunching. Then he looked
past his feet to a thin lip of stone sticking out of the cliff wall.. . held
his breath . . . and let go.
But Magneto, and Sabretooth with him, were not far behind.
Magneto walked briskly down the catwalk to Kelly's cell and along
the metal drawbridge that extended magically before him.
"So how are we feeling, Senator?" he asked heartily as the metal bars
of the cell door bent to let him and Sabretooth pass through.
"Advanced, I hope."
He froze as he realized the room was empty—except for Kelly's shoes.
Magneto smiled and raised
his eyes to the barred window. So, Kelly had escaped.
Magneto wasn't worried. He focused hard on the bars and sighed as
they tore out of the window and fell, clattering at his feet. Then he
stepped over to the empty window and leaned outside.
Just below him, Kelly stood trembling on the narrow stone ledge.
"Did you squeeze through these bars?" Magneto called down, half
amused and half annoyed.
Kelly looked up in horror. "What have you done to me?" he cried.
Magneto shook his head. "Senator, this is pointless. Where would
you go? Who would take you in now that you're one of us?"
One ofus.. .The blood drained out of Kelly's face as he realized just
what Magneto had done.
Then, still smiling. Magneto stepped back. "Sabretooth!" he barked,
motioning toward the window.
With a long, low growl, Sabretooth leaned out and roughly grabbed
the senator's hand. But Kelly's jellylike flesh just collapsed and slid
wetly through his claws. Sabretooth raised his arm to display the
senator's torn coat . . . and nothing else.
Sabretooth glanced back sheepishly at Magneto. Disgusted, the
villain turned and stamped back through the bent bars of the cell
door. With a flick of his wrist, he let the bars spring into place behind
him—leaving Sabretooth inside as punishment for allowing Senator
Kelly to escape.
THE X-MANSION—THE NEXT DAY
In the morning Rogue continued her classes. It was clear, though,
that the other kids weren't sure what to make of her anymore. Word
of what had happened between her and Logan had gotten around. By
lunchtime not one student had said a word to her—though plenty
had talked about her.
Sadly Rogue sat down at a table away from the others and fiddled
with her tuna sandwich.
"Rogue . . ."
Rogue looked up to see the cute boy from Storm's class staring at her
from the shadow of the trees.
"Bobby," she said, surprised.
"Rogue . . . what did you do?"
Rogue shook her head slowly. "I didn't mean to touch him," she said
sincerely. "I didn't know what to do. I—"
"They're saying you steal other mutants' powers," he whispered.
"That's not true!" Rogue replied. She let out a deep breath. "I mean . .
. not really."
The boy took a step closer and looked into Rogue's eyes. "You don't
ever use your power against another mutant," he told her.
A single tear dropped slowly from her eye. "But I had no choice—"
Bobby held up his hand. "If I were you," he said, "I'd get myself out of
here."
"What do you mean?"
Bobby nodded toward the kids at the other end of the yard. "I mean
the students are all freaked. Professor Xavier's furious. I don't know
what he'll do with you ... I think it'll be easier on your own."
Rogue tried to hold back the tears that were now welling in her eyes.
But they poured out anyway. She bent her head over her tray and
started sobbing.
"Rogue," Bobby said softly, "you should go. The train station is that
way." He pointed. "If you hurry
you'll be gone before anyone comes looking for
vnn "
you.
Meanwhile, in Professor X's subterranean lab, the professor was
examining Logan's X rays more closely. Behind him, Cyclops sat on
the lab table and looked over his shoulder.
"What are you looking for, Eric?" Professor X asked, as much to
himself as to anyone.
Cyclops shrugged and adjusted his visor. "No luck with Cerebro?" he
said, changing the subject.
Professor X shook his head. "No. It's strange." He rubbed his eyes
and moved aside to give Cyclops a better view.
He could usually depend on Cerebro to help him find any mutant.
But Magneto was nowhere to be found.
"There are more powerful mutants out there," the professor
murmured thoughtfully, referring to Logan. "Why is this one so
important to Magneto?"
"Maybe it's his way with people," Cyclops joked.
The professor turned and looked at his prize student thoughtfully.
"You don't like him, do you?" he said.
"How can you tell?" Cyclops replied.
Professor X smiled. "Well, I'm psychic, you know." Then he turned
back to the light board. "I think he could be a valuable addition
here."
Cyclops' jaw tightened and he leaned forward. "He's not one of us!"
he argued.
"But he is," the professor reminded him. "Don't forget that."
Cyclops frowned. "Fine. But you put a guy like that in a combat
situation, there's no way he's going to take orders."
"Give him an order worth following, and he'll take it," the professor
said.
"He's not a team player," Cyclops told him.
Professor X rubbed his chin. "Neither were you."
Cyclops shook his head and opened his mouth to protest again—just
as the lab door swung wide and Lx)gan barged in.
"Where is she?" he shouted.
"Who?" asked Cyclops.
"Rogue," said Professor X grimly. He had read Logan's thoughts
before the man could answer. "She's gone."
M
Moments later Professor X was leading Cyclops, Storm, Jean, and
Logan down a long, brightly lit corridor. At the end was a door made
of thick polished steel. The professor stopped his chair in front of it,
and the others stopped too.
"What are we doing?" Logan asked, his voice tense and impatient.
"Why aren't we looking for her?"
"We are," Cyclops told him with just as much irritation.
Logan's eyes narrowed as he watched Professor X wheel up to a small
screen in the wall at his eye level. The screen lit up and a thin vertical
beam began to scan his face.
"The brain waves of mutants are different from those of average
human beings," the professor explained to Logan as the hght passed
over his eyes and read his retinas. "I have a device which amplifies
my power—allowing me to locate mutants over great distances. It's
how I followed Sabretooth to you."
Logan heard a small beep and the loud knock of tumblers rolling
away. The vault door opened . . . and a low, booming voice chimed
through the room out toward them.
"Welcome, Professor."
It was Cerebro.
**Welcome to Cerebro," Professor X announced as the crew foUowed
him into the huge spherical chamber.
Lx)gan looked around, then back at Xavier. He was amazed—and
rather impressed.
"Well, this certainly is a . . . big, round room," he told the professor.
"Why don't you just use this to find Magneto?"
"I've been trying," Professor X told him. "But he seems to have foimd
a way to shield himself from it."
Logan fi*owned. "How would he know how to do that?" he asked.
Professor X looked down at his hands folded in his lap. "Because he
helped me build it."
Logan's mouth fell open as he turned to stare at Xavier. Magneto . . .
had helped Professor X!
"Now, if you'll excuse me . . .," the professor said, clearing his throat.
With the press of a button, he wheeled himself farther down the
platform on which the group was standing.
Jean Grey stepped up to a large, complicated control board and
began entering information.
"Thank you, Jean," Professor X told her. He waited for Logan, Jean,
and the others to leave the room.
Outside the door, Logan watched the professor wheel his chair into
place in the very center of Cerebro. Xavier lowered a shiny, helmetlike piece of equipment over his
head—and the door to the chamber slammed shut and sealed with a
heavy click.
Inside, Professor X sat perfectly still as the chamber came to life
around him. The bright metal walls began to expand until they
seemed to explode and disappear—leaving the professor seated
within a deep black void.
Outside, Logan stared hard at Cerebro's steel door. "What's it hke?"
he asked Jean.
She shook her head. "I've never used it," she told him. "It takes a
degree of control. And . . ."
"And I'm not prepared to see your memory get erased," Cyclops said,
stepping over and draping his arm around her shoulder.
Cerebro's door opened and Professor X emerged. Calmly he looked
around at the eager faces before him. "I've seen her," he said, taking
a deep breath. "She's a few miles up the road—at the train station."
"I'll go," said Logan immediately.
But Professor X held up his hand. "You can't leave the mansion,
Logan," he said sternly. "It's just the opportunity Magneto needs."
"Yeah," Logan argued, "but I'm the reason she took off."
"We had a deal," the professor said, looking hard at Logan. "Fortyeight hours."
Logan looked down. He knew the professor was right.
"She's all right, Logan," Jean reassured him. "She's just upset."
Xavier turned to the other two. "Storm, Cyclops, go see if you can
talk to her."
Storm and Cyclops nodded, and Logan watched as they hurried off to
the ready room. Then he let out a low, long growl of frustration and
stormed off toward his room.
Minutes later Cyclops and Storm were just about to climb into a
shiny black SUV when Cyclops noticed skid marks on the garage
floor.
"Oh, man," he breathed.
Storm peered over from her side of the truck. "What?" she asked.
"Logan," Cyclops answered, glaring. He pointed to the long black
marks leading out into the driveway. "He took my motorcycle."
WESTCHESTER TRAIN STATION—THAT DAY
Rogue slid down in her seat and gazed out the window as she waited
for her train to pull out of the station. Across the aisle, a mother and
child were holding hands. But Rogue couldn't bear to watch them. It
only made her lonelier than she felt already.
"Hey, kid."
Rogue started at the sound of the familiar voice beside her and
turned to see Logan sitting down in the next seat. She looked into his
dark eyes briefly, then turned away.
"You're runnin* again," his voice went on.
"How did you know where I was?" Rogue asked, her back still toward
him.
"Well," Logan began, "the professor put on this metal head thing . . ."
He stopped and rolled his eyes. "Don't ask." Then he tried to peer
around her shoulder. "Do you even have a ticket?"
"No," she said flatly.
"Then let me give you some free advice." Logan leaned in closer.
"When the ticket guy comes, hide in the bathroom. You won't have to
pay." He smiled and waited for Rogue to reply. But she just kept
staring out the window.
Finally she took a deep breath and broke the silence. "I heard the
professor was mad at me."
Logan looked at her, puzzled. "Why would he be mad at you?" he
asked.
Rogue sighed and bent her head. "Because I used my power on
another mutant," she muttered, "and I'm never supposed to."
"Who told you that?" Logan asked, curling his lip. "The professor's
worried about you. Whoever told you he was mad is nuts!"
At that moment, the one responsible for Rogue's running away was
standing outside the door to Cerebro . . . shifting the atoms in her
body and easily morphing from Bobby to Professor X. The figure
knelt in front of the retinal scanner and waited for the beam to pass
over its eyes. Then it stood up again as the door to Cerebro clicked
and smoothly slid open.
"Welcome, Professor," the machine announced.
Morphing back into her true form. Mystique smugly walked in.
She headed straight for the control console and swung herself over
the side of the platform so that she was hanging underneath. She
pulled out a smooth metal screwdriver and pried open a small panel.
White light instantly spilled out. It was Cerebro's beautiful fiberoptic core.
Smiling, Mystique let the bright light wash over her face. Then she
narrowed her eyes and with a cruel hiss drove her screwdriver deep
inside— smashing the delicate filaments again and again.
Meanwhile, back at the train station, Logan was trying to convince
Rogue not to go.
He took a deep breath. "You know, I woke up one day in the woods—
in the middle of nowhere. I had no memories, no life." He held up a
fist to show Rogue the marks on his hand. "I didn't know where these
had come from." He shook his head sadly. "At frrst I couldn't live
with it. I wished I were dead. I looked at this power of mine as a
curse. I tried to kill myself once, but.. .Then I decided to live like I
didn't care— and I didn't. I figured whatever happened, happened. I
didn't really care. Then, uhhh ... when you ... when you touched me
last night . . ." He looked at Rogue. "When you touched me, for one
second ... I felt death. And I realized I didn't like it. You gave me back
a reason to live. I don't want to die anymore, and I wanted to thank
you for that."
Rogue sniffed and wiped at the tear that had started down her cheek.
"You think I should go back," she said almost hopefully.
"I think you should follow your instincts," Logan told her.
With that. Rogue let her lonely tears spill out. She was so thankful
Logan had found her. And relieved not to have to run away again.
She lowered her head and cried.
"It's just so hard," she said. "I don't know what
happens ... I just get these feelings. I can still remember the first boy
who kissed me . . . it's like he's inside my head . . . like he's part of
me. Even you . . . I can feel you in my head . . . nothing specific, but
it's there . . . and it scares me."
She felt Logan place his jacket carefully around her, and instinctively
she pulled back. But Logan held her firmly through the warm, wellworn leather. And for the first time in a long, long while. Rogue felt
that she could safely lean on a friend. She let go of her fears and
sobbed into his shoulder.
"There's not many people that'll understand what you're going
through. Rogue," Logan said gently. "But I think this guy Xavier's
one of them. And he seems to genuinely want to help you. That's a
rare thing for . . . y'know"—he shrugged—"people like us."
A loud, low whistle soimded, and with a lurch the train began to pull
out.
Logan looked out the window. "We can still get ofi" at the next
station," he said as he watched the Westchester station roll by. "What
do you say? Hop a cab, give these geeks one more shot? Come on, I'll
take care of you."
Rogue lifted her head and wiped some of the wetness from her
cheeks. "You promise?" she asked.
His brows knitted and he looked into her eyes. He was not a man to
give his word lightly. If he promised to take of care of Rogue, he had
to be there for her always. For as long as he could remember, he had
lived his life on his own—tied to no one. K he promised Rogue, it
would change things forever. Slowly he nodded. "Yeah, I promise,"
he said. Then, awkwardly, he turned back to the window. "No more
heart-to-hearts, though, okay? I can't tell you how much I hate this
bit."
Rogue grinned and laughed a little. Then suddenly she felt herself fly
forward, crashing—^hard—into the back of the seat in front of her.
She looked up, stunned, to see Logan go shooting down the aisle.
The train had stopped—and now it felt as if it was starting to move
backward. What was going on?
Back at the station, Cyclops and Storm had just arrived in search of
Rogue. While Cyclops went off to check the snack bars and waiting
areas. Storm stared up at the arrivals and destinations board.
"Excuse me," Storm said, stepping up to the
ticket window. She waved to one of the cashiers. "I was wondering if
you could help me. I'm looking for a young girl. About seventeen.
She's my height and has brown hair. She may have been . . . upset . .
."
The woman behind the counter looked thouglitful for a moment.
Then her mouth fell open and her eyes grew wide with fear.
Storm turned to look over her shoulder—just in time to see
Sabretooth, dressed in a long black trench coat, knock a child out of
the way and race toward her. He extended a hairy claw and grabbed
her by the throat.
Storm choked and reached for her neck. But Sabretooth's
superhuman grip was like a vise. He lifted her off her feet and
brought her close to his foul-smelling mouth.
"Scream for me," he growled.
As the crowd around them began to shriek, he pulled back his hairy
arm and slammed Storm hard against the thick glass shield of the
ticket window.
Across the station, Cyclops turned at the sounds of shattering glass
and terrified voices.
"Storm!" he gasped.
He tried to run and help her, but the panicked crowd blocked his
way. He dodged right, then left,
but he was getting nowhere. Then he felt his visor being ripped from
his head.
BOOM!
As the mutant Toad sprang away, Cyclops' visor dangling from his
sticky tongue, a deep red beam shot out of Cyclops' eyes toward the
roof of the station. It was as if a giant fire hydrant spewing red light
had just been torn from the ground.
Cyclops shut his eyes tight. But not before the rush of uncontrolled
energy blasted a hole in the train station ceiling, sending plaster,
wood, and chunks of steel pouring down.
"Get hack!" Cyclops called out to the frightened crowd. "Get out of
the way!" He fell to the floor, blind and helpless. "Storm!" he called
frantically. "Storm!"
Sabretooth, of course, was grinning. Cyclops was now out of
commission, and Storm was . . . Sabretooth turned to his beaten foe
and looked savagely into her eyes. But somehow her eyes looked
different. They had turned from blue to completely white.
Sabretooth felt every hair on his shaggy body stand on end. He was
confused at first. But confusion turned to fear as he watched Storm's
body begin to twitch and shake.
BOOM!—a huge bolt of lightning shot down from
the ceiling. It landed with a sharp crack between his body and
Storm's and sent him flying through the air, smashing through both
the giant station clock and the schedule board. Sabretooth finally
crashed to the ground in the station baggage room, stunned and
scorched from the fiery ride.
Immediately Toad swung his slimy body across the station after
Sabretooth. And as Toad picked up his battered ally and ushered him
off, Cyclops tried to feel his own way to his friend.
"Storm!" he called. "Storm!" as he groped along a bench.
But there was no reply. Cyclops didn't know whether Storm was
unconscious ... or dead. But there was no way he could open his eyes
to see.
Finally his hands found Storm's fallen body. She was covered in bits
of broken glass, but she had a pulse—weak, but steady.
Cyclops cradled her in his arms and rocked her gently. "Storm. Wake
up," he whispered. "We've got to get out of here."
On the train the lights had gone out and the sounds of bending metal
and popping rivets filled the air.
Logan stayed where he was. But the passengers around him were
running for their hves—away from the back wall of the car, which
was starting to tear ofif.
Logan looked at Rogue, who was still huddled in her seat. Then he
looked back toward the rear of the car. With an ear-shattering
THWANK! the thick metal panel finally popped ofif and a figure
dressed in a black cape and a heavy black helmet floated into view.
Looking cold and confident. Magneto touched down gently on the
floor of the train car. He walked down the aisle—the roof and walls
bending and creaking with his every step.
SHOOK!
Logan's claws shot out as the villain neared.
"You must be Wolverine," Magneto said with a sinister smile. Then
he held up his fist, and Logan instantly felt his body lock into a
frozen position.
"That remarkable metal doesn't run through your entire body, does
it?" Magneto asked. He let his eyes roam over Logan from head to
foot. Then he opened up his hand and watched, amused, as Logan's
arms and legs spread out like a starfish. "I guess it does."
Logan gasped as a sharp pain cut through his body. It was a pain he'd
never felt before—the pain
of his claws being pulled out of his hand, farther than they'd ever
been stretched before. He grimaced as he struggled to free himself
from Magneto's force. But there was nothing—nothing—^he could
do.
"Stop it! Stop it!" Rogue cried as she looked on in horror from behind
her crumpled seat.
"What ... do you want . . . with me?" Logan panted, drained and
tortured.
The Master of Magnetism arrogantly sniffed. "My dear boy," he
replied, "whoever said I wanted youy
Then he smiled and let his eyes wander over to Rogue . . . and
Logan's heart froze.
Not Rogue!
Logan struggled even more fiercely against the villain's magnetic
powers. But Magneto sneered and closed his fist and sent Logan
flying back with a heavy crash into the hard steel door of the train
car. Magneto drew back his cloak to reveal a long metal syringe
attached to his belt by a thin metal strap. With a flick of his finger,
the strap peeled back and a needle drifted up and hovered in midair.
Rogue's eyes darted from Logan to Magneto and back to her fallen
friend. His body wasn't moving, but she thought she heard a heavy
groan. She had to help him.
She slid out of her seat and ran down the aisle toward Logan. But she
never made it to him. Before she reached the end, the syringe flew
out and pierced the back of her neck. She fell to the floor in a
crumpled heap. And Magneto wiped his hands together in
satisfaction.
A short time later, Magneto strode through the now ruined and
empty train station and out the shattered front doors. At his side
were a cocky Toad, wearing Cyclops' visor, and a wounded but
walking Sabre-tooth, carrying Rogue's limp body in a large black
satin sack.
Outside the station, more than fifty police officers were waiting for
the villains. The flashing red lights of their police cars swept across
the broken building and lit up the villains' dark faces as they stepped
into the street.
The lead policeman stood behind his squad car and held up a
megaphone. "Put your hands up over your heads," he shouted.
Magneto just looked at the officers with disdain.
"I said raise your hands!"
Coyly Magneto obeyed their order. He slowly
raised his hands and pointed at the policemen. Then he flicked his
wrists—and two squad cars went flying into the air hke a pair of
playing cards.
At once the lead officer dropped his megaphone and pulled out his
gun. But he might as well have pulled out a paper clip. Magneto
dropped his hands—and every gun in the parking lot flew out of the
officers' hands, turned in midair, and floated back down in a line,
pointed directly at their owners.
Magneto shook his head. "You Homo sapiens and your guns," he
scoffed.
Then he moved his hands like an orchestra conductor about to hit
the final note—
Magneto stopped. Or rather, something stopped him. He turned to
see who was gripping his shoulder.
Sabretooth?
The beast set his sack on the ground and roughly grabbed Magneto's
throat. "That's enough, Eric," he growled.
Magneto stood, stunned. Then he heard a long hiss behind him. It
was Toad.
"Let them go," the mutant warned with a threatening flick of his
tongue.
"Ah . . ." Magneto suddenly looked around and
smiled. Of course. He should have known. This was clearly the work
of his old friend Professor X.
"Why not come out where I can see you, Charles?" he called.
Sabretooth's grip on his arm slowly tightened. "What do you want
her for?" It was the beast's voice. But it was Xavier asking the
question.
The professor was parked in his long black Bent-ley behind the police
barricades—^with Jean Grey at his side.
Magneto looked at Sabretooth and tapped the side of his helmet.
"Can't you read my mind?" he asked teasingly. "So what now? Save
the girl? You'll have to kill me, Charles. And what will that
accomplish?" An angry scowl fell over his face. "Let them have their
way and they'll have you in chains with a number burned into your
forehead."
"It's not going to be that way," Professor X answered.
Magneto's eyes narrowed. "Then kill me and find out." He paused for
a moment. "Now, release me," he commanded.
But Sabretooth's grip was steady.
"No?" Magneto said, raising his eyebrows and nodding. "Fine."
BANG!
Professor X jolted back in his seat, and Jean Grey gasped in shock.
The gun in front of the lead police officer had fired, and the bullet
was stopped just in front of the shaking man's face. As it pressed into
the sizzling flesh of the cop's forehead, even Professor X could hear
the other guns cock all at once.
"Care to press your luck, Charles?" Magneto asked with an evil grin.
He looked around at the floating weapons. "I don't think you can
stop them all from firing."
In his car. Professor X lowered his eyes, and Sabretooth's hand fell
limply away from Magneto's shoulder. Released from Xavier's
control. Toad and Sabretooth looked around, dazed.
Magneto shook his head. "Still unwilling to make sacrifices," he told
the professor. "That's what makes you weak."
"No, Eric," Professor X rephed. "That's what makes me strong."
The faint sound of a helicopter was heard coming from the east.
"Well," Magneto went on with a wave of his hand, "I wish I had more
time to chat, but I must go."
He looked up to see a gleaming black chopper settling down on the station lawn. The door slid open, and through the
wind and dust, he saw Mystique sitting at the controls.
With Toad and Sabretooth close behind him. Magneto hurried
toward the aircraft. He made sure the sack with Rogue inside was
safely on board. Then he stopped in the doorway and turned.
"Goodbye, Charles," he said with a heavy sigh.
He climbed aboard the chopper, and Mystique lifted off.
THE X-MANSION—LATER THAT NIGHT
Foiled but not defeated, Professor X and his X-Men gathered in his
office. They had to figure out some way to rescue Rogue—and stop
the sinister Magneto from whatever terrible plot he was bent on
seeing through. But so far no one had any idea what to do.
Logan turned on the professor. "You said he wanted we," he shouted
angrily.
Professor X shook his head. "I've made a terrible mistake," he sighed.
"His helmet... it was somehow designed to block my telepathy. I
couldn't see what he was after until it was too late."
"It's not your fault," Cyclops told the professor.
"No," Logan scoffed. "Why blame the biggest brain on the planet!"
"Hey!" Cyclops turned his newly visored head in Logan's direction. "I
didn't see you stop him."
Logan glared back at him. "How could you, blind man?"
"It's this kind of thing that makes me wonder how you're gonna
outwit Magneto," he told the professor with disgust. Then he turned
and stormed out of the office.
Logan was still fuming as he came out of his room and headed for the
mansion door.
"Where are you going?" Storm asked, coming up behind him.
Logan stopped and turned to her. He looked from her bruised and
bandaged neck into her soft blue eyes. "I'm going to find her," he said
stiffly.
Storm shook her head. "You can't just leave."
"Why?" Logan asked. He jammed his fist into the arm of his leather
jacket and pulled it on. "Should I wait for Xavier and his fanatics to
make everything all right?"
"We're not fanatics, Logan," Storm replied.
Logan rolled his eyes. "No?" he said mockingly. "Then what are you?
Why are you doing all this?"
Storm's gaze was steady. "Because humanity needs us."
"Oh, humanity needs you," he snapped back, angrily yanking up the
jacket's zipper. "How have they lived all this time without you?"
"It's a different world now," Storm calmly explained. "As a new
species, we have a responsibihty to protect them. To teach human
beings to accept our presence here."
Logan snorted and started to walk away. But Storm followed.
Logan shook his head. "This is what pisses me off about you
hypocrites," he went on. "All your high-minded ideals—and you still
hate them just as much as they hate you. I mean, I dislike everyone
equally, but you . . .you talk about human beings like they're
children, waiting for you to punish them for their ignorance."
He stopped and looked at Storm again. "They did hate you, didn't
they? Hey, it's not like I don't understand."
Then Logan raised his fist and—SHOOK!—let his claws release in fiont of his face.
"They cut open my body and turned me into this," he said, speaking
through the claws. "What did they do to you?"
Storm's chin trembled. In her mind she could see as if it had been
yesterday the children taunting and teasing her. But these were
memories she had worked hard to forget.
"They . . .," she began. "Fve . . . overcome the trials of my past."
Logan sneered as he—SHOOK!—drew his claws back in. "Good for
you," he said. As Storm stood beside him, shaken and silent, he
reached for the front door.
"You know, your professor's right," he said as he turned the knob. "I
think there is a war coming." He cut his eyes to Storm. "You sure
you're on the right side?"
Storm waited a moment to answer. "At least I've chosen a side," she
said finally.
Logan cast his eyes down for a second. Then with a grunt he pulled
open the door.
''■Uuuh . . ." Storm gasped, and even Logan started at the sight of a
pale, sick-looking Senator
Kelly standing on the doorstep. He was dressed in ill-fitting clothes
he'd apparently found somewhere. And a moist, slimy ooze was
dripping off his body.
"Fm looking for Dr. Jean Grey," he said weakly. Then he fell with a
heavy thud into Logan's startled arms.
As they made their way to the X-Mansion's laboratory, Jean Grey
briefed Professor X on the status of their new patient.
"I can't explain it," she said, shaking her head, "but he's a mutant, or
. . . he's somehow become one." In all her years of working with
mutants, she'd never seen anything like it.
Professor X looked up at her. "What's his mutation?"
"He's extremely adaptable," Jean answered. "He can effectively
change the shape of his body. But"— her forehead wrinkled
—"something's wrong with him. His cells are losing their integrity.
They're liquefying. He's literally falling apart . . . dying before our
eyes."
Professor X frowned and nodded.
They were silent until they reached the laboratory. Professor X
waited for the lab doors to open, then steered his chair inside.
"Senator Kelly," he said as he wheeled up to the lab table. "My name
is Professor Charles Xavier."
Weakly the senator turned his head toward the professor. He was
burning up with fever and seemed to be sweating out every drop of
moisture in his body. His eyes were sunken and barely open. And
every shallow breath he took sounded as if it might be his last.
"This is my school," Professor X told him.
Kelly's eyelids fluttered for a moment. "For mutants," he said, more
as a statement than a question.
"Yes," the professor said slowly.
The senator let out a raspy sigh. "I was afraid if I went to a hospital,
they would . . ."
Professor X leaned over and finished Kelly's sentence. "Treat you like
a mutant? You know, we are not what you think. Not all of us."
Kelly groaned and closed his eyes. "Tell it to the ones that did this to
me," he whispered.
Professor X nodded. He knew all too well to
whom the senator was referring. And he knew he had to stop him—
soon.
While Jean Grey looked on. Professor X reached out and placed a
hand on Kelly's forehead. The senator's eyes drifted back open.
"Senator," said the professor, looking deep into the sick man's eyes,
"I need you to try to relax. I'm not going to hurt you." He began to
probe Kelly's mind . . . to go back into the senator's memory to see
just what Magneto had done.
Later that night, while Storm kept watch over Senator Kelly, the
other X-Men gathered in Professor X's office.
"So," Logan said, cutting to the chase. "What does Magneto want
with Rogue?"
Professor X shook his head. "The senator doesn't know." He was
thoughtful for a moment. "It seems he's built a machine which emits
radiation that triggers mutations in normal human beings."
"But the mutation is imnatural." Jean Grey spoke up. "Kelly's body is
rejecting it. His cells began to break down almost immediately."
"What effect does the radiation have on mutants?" Cyclops asked.
"None," said the professor.
"However," Jean added darkly, "it'll most likely kill any normal
person exposed to it."
The X-Men let the shocking news sink in.
"Hey, Chuck," said Logan finally.
Professor X's eyebrows went up as he turned to Logan. No one had
ever called him Chuck before.
"You said this machine draws its power from Magneto?"
"Yes," Professor X answered.
"What'd it do to him?"
The professor thought for a moment. "It weakened him ... in fact, it
nearly killed . . ." His eyes grew wider. "Oh my God . . . He's going to
transfer his power to Rogue!"
In the lab. Storm kept watch over the declining senator. As he slept,
she dabbed at her cuts and scratches with a clean cotton swab. Then
she heard the frail sound of the senator's voice.
"Is somebody there?"
Storm stood up and moved over to the bed. The senator already
looked worse than he had a few minutes before. His sunken skin was
nearly gray, and thick, viscous fluid covered every inch of his body.
To Storm, it looked as if the fluid was eating him away.
"Is somebody—"
"Yes. I'm here," Storm replied calmly.
The senator tried to open his eyes, but the oozing fluid made it hard.
"Are you . . . one of them?" he asked feebly.
Storm watched as the slime poured out of his skin, soaking the bed
and dripping onto the floor. "Who is them}'' she asked.
"I guess I don't know anymore." Kelly smiled weakly. "I guess it
doesn't matter." He took a labored breath. "Please don't leave."
"All right," Storm said. She took a step closer to his bed.
The senator let out a thin sigh. "I just don't want to be . . . alone." He
tried once again to see who was by his side. "Do you hate . . . normal
people?" he asked.
Storm paused. "Sometimes." She had to be honest.
"Why?" Kelly asked.
"I suppose I'm afraid of them," she explained.
Kelly laughed bitterly. "Well, I think you've got one less person to be
afraid of." Then his eyes rolled back and he stared blankly at the
ceiling.
Storm couldn't help feeling sorry for the man. She had suffered as a
child—but his suffering was greater than anything she'd known . . .
and it was only getting worse. She reached out and gently took hold
of the senator's hand. And she watched in pain and pity as it slowly
melted away.
Professor X gripped the arms of his chair. "I'll use Cerebro to try and
find Rogue." Then he looked across his desk at Cyclops. "Cyclops,
would you and Storm ready the jet?"
Cyclops nodded.
"And Jean," Professor X went on, "find Logan a uniform."
"No!" Cyclops suddenly sat forward in his chair. "He's not coming."
Logan glared at him. "You little—"
"Fm sorry, Professor," Cyclops announced, cutting the other man off.
"It's not going to happen. He'll endanger the mission and my team."
"Hey!" said Logan. He leaned across Jean Grey toward Cyclops—
until he was so close that he could see his face in Cyclops' goggles. "I
wasn't the one who gave the train station a new sunroof, so you can
have your little mission. I'll do this on my own."
"Stop acting like children!" Professor X finally roared. "Both of you!"
His eyes bore into Logan and then Cyclops. "People's lives are at
stake. Rogue's life is at stake."
The door to Xavier's office opened and Storm walked solemnly in.
"Senator Kelly's dead," she said.
Professor X sat perfectly still as the news sank in. One life had just
been taken. Who knew how soon Magneto would try to take more?
He wheeled himself out firom behind his desk and glared at Cyclops
and Logan. "Settle this," he commanded. Then he wheeled out of the
room and rolled toward Cerebro.
Inside Cerebro, Professor X wheeled into place and let the door close
behind him. He lowered the headpiece into place and activated the
machine.
WANK! CRZZZZ! ZUPPPP!
Suddenly the professor was in terrible pain. Something had gone
wrong—terribly wrong!—with Cerebro.
Professor X grabbed at his helmeted head. He reached blindly for the
controls on the arm of his chair. He swatted at the buttons again and
again, until he finally hit the right one and an alarm bell sounded.
Gradually the horrible noises stopped and the door to Cerebro
opened. But by then Professor X was unconscious.
nrnrmrfm
THE X-MANSION—UTER THAT DAY
While Jean Grey studied the monitors keeping track of Professor X's
rambling brain waves, the other X-Men sadly stood around their
fallen leader.
"What can we do?" Storm said hopelessly.
The X-Men looked at each other.
"We just have to wait," Jean said at last.
Logan looked over at her and nodded. Slowly he turned toward
Cyclops. He couldn't see the other man's eyes behind his opaque
visor. But he could feel Cyclops' steady gaze on him . . . and he knew
their fight was over.
He moved toward the door and touched Cyclops' shoulder as he
passed by.
"I'm sorry," he said simply, nodding toward Professor X.
Then he headed for his room.
Hours later. Professor X still had not stirred. And Cyclops had still
not left his side.
"You can hear me . . . can't you?" he whispered, looking down on the
professor's pale, still body. There were things he wanted to teU the
professor—things he wanted to be sure that the man knew. And now
that they were alone . . .
"I want to thank you for taking me in," he said sincerely. "Taking us
in, I mean . . . You've taught me everything in my life that is worth
knowing." He took a long, grieving breath and bent down closer.
"And I want you to know that I'll take care of them."
Cyclops stood and, not knowing what else to do, pulled the
professor's blanket up a little higher.
At that instant he noticed a low, steady hum filling his ears. It
sounded like . . . Cerebro?
Cyclops hurried out of the lab and down the corns
ridor toward the device. As he neared it, a thin face peered out at him
from the doorway,
"Jean?" Cyclops called out. She must have repaired the broken
machine, he decided. But what was she up to now?
Then Jean's face disappeared . . . and Cyclops suddenly realized what
was going on.
"Jean, no!" he cried.
But it was too late. Jean had pressed the activation button, and the
doors to Cerebro shd closed before Cyclops could get there.
Inside, Jean knelt down in the place where Professor X's chair would
normally go. She took his headpiece in her shaking hands, looking
fearfully at the shining helmet. She was terrified of what the machine
could do to her. But she was the only one besides the professor who
could use it. Someone had to find out where Magneto was and what
he planned to do with Rogue. And if the professor wasn't able— she
would have to.
She lowered the headpiece onto her head—and waited for the
machine to grab hold of her mind.
Outside, Cyclops pounded on Cerebro's doors. But they were shut
tight. He pounded once more.
then backed away. If Jean wasn't going to open them, he would blast
the doors open with his laser vision.
He focused his sight on the thick metal doors and—
—watched as the doors slid open.
"Jean!" Cyclops cried. He ran into the machine and knelt over her
limp body. "Answer me—please."
Carefully he lifted the helmet off her head—and to his relief, he saw
that she was dazed but alive.
Jean's heart was racing and her breath came out in rapid, gasping
pants. She looked up at Cyclops weakly and tried to form words.
"What is it, Jean?" he asked her.
"I know where Magneto's going."
»ji<ftMB»»i>WMiiiw»Mtj«»iiiMIMi
NEW YORK HARBOR—LATER THAT NIGHT
In the darkness of the Manhattan night, a pohce boat motored up to
the man-made shore beneath the Statue of Liberty. To the other
pohce boats and guards scattered around the harbor, it looked as if it
were going about its official business. But to anyone close by, it
would have been clear that there was nothing official about it.
As the boat bumped against the rocky seawall, the pilot was
transformed into the shimmering Mystique. And from below deck
emerged the black-caped figure of Magneto . . . followed by Rogue.
The villain led Rogue onto the deck, where Sabretooth appeared and took hold of the rope that was tied around her
neck. As her eyes adjusted to the darkness, Rogue made out a very
large object covered by a tarp—and the Statue of Liberty looming
behind it.
Roughly Sabretooth forced her to her knees in front of Magneto.
"Magnificent, isn't she?" the villain told her, nodding over his
shoulder toward the towering statue.
Rogue looked up at him, bored. "I've seen it," she spat back.
"I first saw her in 1949," Magneto went on. "America was going to be
the land of tolerance. Of peace . . ." He looked back at the statue
longingly and took off his Cerebro-proof helmet.
"Are you going to kill me?" Rogue asked blimtly, interrupting
Magneto's memories and snapping him back to the present.
He gazed down at her and nodded. "Yes."
"Why?" Rogue asked.
"Because there is no land of tolerance," Magneto told her. "There is
no peace. Not here or anywhere else." He shrugged. "I'm sure
Charles would disagree. But Charles has not seen what I've seen." His
eyes grew wide and furious. "Women and children—
whole families—destroyed simply because they were born different
from those in power. Well, after tonight, the world's powerful will be
just like us." He motioned toward Mystique and Sabretooth, and
Toad squatting beside them. "They will return home as brothers, as
mutants. And our cause . . . will be theirs. Your sacrifice will mean
our survival."
He smiled down at Rogue sadly. "Of course. Til understand if that
comes as small consolation."
He turned to Sabretooth. "Put her in the machine."
Magneto stepped off the boat and looked once more at the statue.
"Ready the machine," he called to Mystique. "I will raise it."
At the X-Mansion, Logan was stuffing his few clothes into a duffel
bag. He heard a soft knock on his door and turned.
"What?" said the look he shot at Storm. He was impatient to get
going.
"Cyclops said he'd like to see everyone down in the map room," she
replied. Her eyes moved to his half-packed bag, then back to him.
"Everyone."
Lx)gan hesitated for a moment. He had waited
long enough already to find Rogue and get her back. He had sworn to
her that he would take care of her. And if he had to do it on his own,
he was ready to go. But he could also tell from Storm's look that
Cyclops must have some information. Maybe there was something to
this idea of working together . . . He'd see what Cyclops had to say.
Logan followed Storm down to the professor's map room—a room
he'd never been inside before. Like the rest of Professor X's
underground facilities, this room was lined with gleaming brushedmetal panels and lit by thin fluorescent lights running along the floor
and ceiling. But in the center of this room, on a large round table,
stood a remarkably detailed miniature replica of New York Harbor.
As Logan entered, Cyclops entered some information into a control
panel on the edge of the map table. Slowly a 3-D model of the Statue
of Liberty rose into view. Beside Cyclops sat Jean Grey, still dazed
and weak from her experience inside Cerebro.
"All right," said Cyclops, glancing up at Logan and nodding. "We can
insert here"—he pointed to a suspension bridge at the north end of
Manhattan— "at the George Washington Bridge."
A small black spot, representing the X-Jet, appeared beside the
bridge. Then, as Cyclops' hand controlled the tracking ball, the spot
moved along the Hudson River . . . and up to the Statue of Liberty.
"We'll come around the back, just off Manhattan," Cyclops went on.
"And land on the far side of Liberty Island. Here."
He looked up at Logan and waited for him to respond.
Logan silently studied the map, keeping his eyes down and his face
blank. His jaw tensed thoughtfully. "What about radar?" he finally
said.
Cyclops smiled. He could tell from the question that Logan was with
them. "If they have anything that can pick up our jet," he reassured
his new partner, "they deserve to catch us."
Once Cyclops had gone over the details of his plan with the X-Men,
they hurried to the ready room to prepare for the mission.
"Hold on a sec," Cyclops called to Logan as the others donned their
outfits. He walked up to Logan
and faced him squarely. "We do this, we do it as a team. Are you
going to have a problem taking orders?"
Logan stared back hard at Cyclops—^but his frown quickly softened
into a look of respect. "I don't know," he replied with a shrug. "Give
me an order."
Cyclops' eyes smiled behind his visor, and he crossed to the bay of
lockers. He slid open a long metal drawer and pulled out a black
leather uniform. He tossed it in Logan's direction.
"Put it on," he ordered.
X-MANSION HANGAR—MINUTES LATER
Aboard the black X-Jet, Logan took his seat behind Cyclops and
fastened his safety belt. Next to him sat Jean Grey, wearing a black
uniform like the others. Storm sat in front of her, in the navigator's
seat. Cyclops was at the controls, ready to fly them to New York City.
Logan gripped the armrests tightly as the X-Jet's engines flared. As
Cyclops lifted off, Logan's knuckles turned from red to white.
"Not a big flier?" asked Storm, looking over.
Logan took a deep breath and kept staring straight ahead. "I can't
remember," he said.
Minutes later the twinkling lights of Manhattan came into view.
Cyclops checked his monitors and pushed a little on the throttle. "All
right," he said, "there's the bridge. I'm taking her down. Storm, some
cover, please."
Storm nodded, and as her eyes began to whiten, a dense gray cloud
began to form over the calm water. Cyclops gently steered the X-Jet
under the George Washington Bridge. And as they came out the
other side, the X-Men quietly disappeared into the fog.
"Okay," Cyclops told Jean. "Go to tactical."
Jean Grey obeyed and punched a code into the jet's onboard
computer. As she did, a low electrical himi began to fill the cockpit
and the fog-filled windows around the X-Men began to darken
slighdy. Within seconds the windows were filled instead with a
crystal-clear video picture of the view outside.
Meanwhile, on Ellis Island, the world's leaders were arriving in a
steady stream of limousines. And, not surprisingly, the place was
teeming with guards and police. At the main entrance, a security
guard checked and double-checked the identity cards of every
passenger in every limo.
"Franklin detail—Germany," announced the Secret Service escort in
the front passenger seat of one car. He handed the guard a coded
placard, which the guard ran through a computer. Then, while
information on the guest came up on the guard's screen, another
guard ran a mirror on a long pole under the chassis to make sure
nothing was hidden there. Finally two German shepherds circled the
car, sniffing for bombs. When everything had been checked out, the
car was waved ahead to deliver its dignitary.
Around Ellis Island, police boats filled the water, and guards in
towers scanned the air to make sure the island was totally secure. But
on Liberty Island, Magneto was not concerned with these meager
attempts by the humans to keep their leaders safe.
He looked out the observation windows in the head of the giant
statue and lifted a radio to his mouth. "How long?" he called into it.
"Ten minutes to curtain," Mystique's voice replied. She was seated
behind the security desk in the base of the Statue of Liberty,
watching a bank of surveillance screens and a TV.
Magneto glared at Sabretooth, who was restlessly pacing behind him,
and looked back out over the island. He noticed the wave of thick fog rolling in across the water. His
face grew dark.
"Tell everyone to stay sharp," he said, speaking into the radio once
more. "We're not alone."
Sabretooth came up and looked over Magneto's shoulder. He
growled and turned and took a heavy step toward the stairs.
"Stay here," Magneto ordered.
"But—" Sabretooth shook his shaggy blond mane in frustration.
"I need you with me," Magneto told him. "Once I've given my power
to the girl, I'll be temporarily weakened. You will be my only
defense."
Sabretooth clamped his fang-fiUed mouth shut and with a long, low
growl stepped back across the room. He had learned long ago to do
what Magneto told him. But he didn't have to be happy about it.
The X-Jet had already reached the island, shrouded by Storm's
opaque blanket of fog. Cyclops flipped a switch on the side of his
steering column and the powerful jet engines cycled down, settling
the plane onto the water. At the same time, the engine ports closed
up and turned into pontoons.
As soon as they were stable, Jean Grey punched a new code into the
computer and the jet's side hatch silently eased open.
Cyclops, Jean, Storm, and finally Logan exited the jet and made their
way through the water to the shore.
When they climbed onto Liberty Island, Storm was the first to see the
statue's giant torch half buried in the ground. Puzzled, she looked up
past the now-clearing fog at the statue's uplifted hand. Then her eyes
grew wide and she pointed for the others. They followed her gaze and
were horrified at what they saw. . . .
The Statue of Liberty's torch had been replaced by Magneto's
machine—and in the center, her hands bound by metal wristlets, was
Rogue—struggling to get free.
Logan immediately let out a fierce and furious growl, and together
the X-Men hurried toward the main entrance of the statue.
They passed through the massive bronze doors and found themselves
in a long hallway that served as the statue's museum. At the end they
could see the metal staircase that led up into the statue. Cyclops nodded and led them around the metal detector near the door
—all but Lx)gan. Without thinking, Lx)gan walked straight through.
Immediately his metal-framed body started the machine buzzing and
blinking. And just as quickly, Logan popped out a claw and drove it
into the alarm mechanism. The others turned in time to watch the
machine spark and sputter out. Then Logan shrugged as if to say he
was sorry—and nodded for them to go on.
The hall was lined with cases filled with Lady Liberty memorabilia—
newspaper clippings, photographs, and artifacts from 1886, the year
the statue was dedicated . . . even a six-foot cast-iron replica of the
statue itself.
Logan held up a hand to stop the others as they passed it.
"There's someone here," he whispered.
"Where?" asked Cyclops.
"I don't know. Keep your eyes open."
Logan didn't see that the eyes of the statue were the same acrid
yellow as Mystique's. He just knew that his senses were telling him
that something— somewhere—was watching him and the others. He
took another step forward and felt the hairs on the back of his neck
brisde once again.
"Hang on," he told the others. He shpped into the shadows of the hall
and was gone.
Cyclops glared from behind his goggles. "Logan, no!" he called to the
darkness. "We need to— Aaaghhhf' he groaned.
He turned to complain to Jean—just as Logan came padding back.
"Anything?" Cyclops asked, still a little annoyed.
Logan shook his head. "I know there's someone here," he answered,
nearing Cyclops, "but I can't see em.
All at once he raised his fist and—SHOOK!—^his claws popped out
and swiped at Cyclops—
BOOM!
As Cyclops pulled back just in time, the real Logan jumped out and
tackled the Mystique-l^ogan roughly from the side. They hit the
ground and started rolling . . . and kept rolling until they stopped in a
side room. When they finally got to their feet, Cyclops was aiming his
eye at both of them. But before he could zap one or the other—
WHAM!—a huge metal door slammed shut between the rooms,
locking the two Logans away from the other X-Men.
Inside, Logan turned to find that the MystiqueLogan had disappeared. He looked around for a second; then—ZAP!
—^the lights suddenly went out.
"Ah, crap," he moaned to the darkness as a boot— WHAM!—came
flying into his face.
Outside, the remaining X-Men charged toward the door and tried in
vain to pull it open.
"Get back! Get back!" Cyclops finally cried.
Jean and Storm obediently stepped back and watched as Cyclops
aimed his red crystal visor at the door. But before he could blast it
open. Toad dropped down with a SPLAT! firom among the girders on
the ceiling, boimced off the wall, and— THWAT!—kicked out at
Cyclops with both feet. Cyclops flew back across the hall and through
another doorway.
Storm raised her arms, and instantly wind began whipping up
around her. But that didn't stop Toad. He leaped at Storm and they
went tumbling over and over, until they stopped and Toad kicked
out, sending Storm flying over a railing and onto the upper floor of
the museum. Toad hopped to his feet and with a mighty leap jumped
out of sight.
Jean Grey looked from Storm on the balcony back to Cyclops on the
ground. He had just gotten back to his feet. But before he could run
back to Jean—
SLAM!—another metal door slammed shut between them.
Jean's mouth fell open and she took a step forward. But a powerful
sense of something—or someone—behind her made her stop and
turn around. It was Toad, eyes bulging and wide mouth grinning
with evil delight. Jean moved back, but Toad moved faster. He
flicked out his long, rubbery tongue and covered Jean's horrified face
with wet, sticky slime. The goo was clear, but it was also thick and
began to harden on Jean's face immediately. She pulled at the slime,
but it was like a second, suffocating skin. And as Jean struggled,
stumbling blindly around the museum. Toad laughed out loud and
sprang away.
Meanwhile, in the room on the east side, Logan thrashed about
blindly in the darkness, searching for Mystique. Claws out, he
crashed into a glass display case, then banged into a cold steel pillar.
He couldn't see or feel Mystique. But he knew she was there.
Suddenly the lights flickered back on and the Mystique-Logan was
there. Instinctively Logan lunged—but the figure he drove his claws
into
turned out not to be Mystique, but only her reflection in a large
mirror.
Logan growled as the glass shattered into a thousand mini-Logans.
Then with a crash he felt his face being slammed into the broken
mirror. Logan pulled back and could see the blood drip from his
wounded face. But he wasn't concerned. He knew the cuts would
quickly heal. He just wanted to find that mutant and let his claws
loose on her. Once again, though, she'd disappeared.
Meanwhile, in the room on the west side, Cyclops trained his eye on
the door in front of him and— BOOM!—blasted it open.
"Jean!" he shouted as his eye fell on Jean Grey still struggling to free
herself from Toad's powerful slime. The goo had started to get crusty,
and Jean could no longer speak or even breathe. Panicked, she stared
back at Cyclops wide-eyed as he ran to her side.
"Hold still!" he told her as he tried to pry it off. But it was stuck fast.
Above them. Storm shook herself off and looked around the balcony.
She felt a drop of cold, wet slime fall on her cheek. She looked up just
as—
WHAM!—Toad spun down and with a THWAP! kicked Storm across
the face. Storm fell back, and Toad jumped on her and ran a sticky
webbed hand over her cheek.
"Such pretty skin," he hissed. "So perfect." His slimy tongue flicked
in and out. "I guess some mutants are just born lucky."
BAM!
Toad rolled off Storm as she drew back her fist and slugged him.
Then, as Toad leaped into the metal rafters, Storm got back to her
feet and readied herself for his next attack. She didn't have long to
wait.
Toad swung down and—^WHAM!—with his webbed feet slammed
into Storm's chest. His blow sent her flying back through a glass
display case and into an open elevator shaft—and with a groan she
fell into the darkness.
Toad hopped happily through the smashed display case and up to the
edge of the shaft. He looked down into the black hole. Storm had
fallen into his trap, just as he'd planned.
Grinning, he squatted down and grabbed the broomstick he'd used to
prop the elevator doors open. As the doors slid shut, he gave the pole
a satisfied twirl and jumped off to finish his work.
He perched on the railing surrounding the second floor of the
museum and peered down at Cyclops and Jean. The X-Man was still
pulling at Jean's encrusted face. If Toad sprang down on them now,
he thought, he could easily kill two birds with one crushing leap. . . .
Toad's eager smile faded as the soft whoosh of elevator doors
opening sounded behind him. He twisted to peer over his shoulder
just as a raging, howling wind blew out of the shaft toward him.
Storm floated up into the open doorway. She was bruised and
bleeding—and she was mad.
"Don't you people die?'' groaned Toad, rolling his bulging eyes.
He hopped off his perch on the railing and used his sticky feet to
fight his way against the wind toward Storm. But the wind only came
faster . . . and faster . . . until it had the force of a hurricane.
As Storm's white eyes grew wider, loose objects and hunks of torn
metal whipped past Toad at lightning speed and gouged the walls
behind him like giant bullets. Finally Toad's toes could not hold him
in place any longer. Storm's wind blew him off his feet and—SMASH!
—back through the glass doors of
the balcony, across the outdoor observation deck, and over the
railing.
Desperately Toad lashed his tongue around the railing. And for a
moment he stayed there, attached to the metal bar and flapping in
the wind like a slimy green flag. But not for long. Seconds later Storm
stepped through another pair of doors onto the observation deck and
held out her arms. And as the raging wind behind her lifted her off
the ground, the air above Toad began to spark and crackle.
"Do you know what happens to a toad when it gets hit by lightning?"
Storm called out above the howl and sizzle of the weather.
Then with a crash a huge bolt of lightning struck the railing, and a
shock of electricity shot through it and up Toad's tongue, blowing
him off the railing and out into the harbor.
Storm watched with satisfaction as he hit the water with a SPLAT!
and disappeared below the surface. "Same thing that happens to
everything else," she said with a smile.
Then she lowered her arms and waited for the wind to die. That was
one villain down. But there were more to go.
Meanwhile, downstairs in the museum, Cyclops was still struggling
to pull the slime off Jean Grey's face. By now, however, the goo had
turned rock hard, and Jean was almost unconscious from lack of
oxygen.
Finally Cyclops let go and stepped back from Jean's twitching body.
"Jean. Jean, stop," he said. "Stop moving."
At first Jean kept struggling. But in a minute she calmed down and
tried to keep still.
"Jean, trust me," Cyclops told her. "Don't move."
Then, with more careful concentration than he'd ever used before,
Cyclops fired a thin, focused optic beam into the encrusted slime.
BAM!
The beam hit the slime like a red-hot hammer, smashing it into a
million tiny pieces. . . .
Then— "Uuuhhh" —Jean drew in a deep breath . . . and Cyclops
sighed with relief.
At the same time, Storm and Logan had found each other in the
hallway.
"Is that you?" Storm asked suspiciously.
"Shhh" Logan whispered back. "The other one ain't far away."
Storm moved in closer. "Come on," she told him, "we have to
regroup."
"I know." Logan nodded, moving closer to her too. "But there's a
problem."
In one swift move, Logan grabbed Storm by the wrist. She struggled
to break free, but Logan held her tight. Then he watched as her hand
morphed from Storm's dark skin to Logan's pale fist with its three
steely claws . . . and finally to Mystique's shimmering green-blue
scales.
Logan's eyes narrowed, and with a POW! he drove his claws into
Mystique-Storm. She twitched as though hit with an electric current.
"No two women smell alike," Logan growled, letting go of Mystique's
hand. Then he watched with disgust as she morphed into her true
form and fell with a thud to the floor.
Logan turned and headed for the closest door. He threw it open and
saw Cyclops and Jean standing beside a life-size model of the Statue
of Liberty's ear.
"It's me," Logan called to them.
Cyclops and Jean whipped around.
"Prove it," Cyclops called back.
Logan grinned. "You're a jerk.'*
Cyclops looked at him for a second and nodded. "Okay . . . Now let's
find Storm."
"Hey," a voice called down from the balcony above them.
The three X-Men looked up. It was Storm.
"Let's take the stairs up," she told them. "I've found them. They're
over here."
Cyclops, Jean, and Logan hurried to the wide metal staircase at the
back of the museum. They joined Storm on the balcony level and
started climbing up.
"This is the way to the arm," Storm told them as they reached a
narrow platform. She pointed to a huge tangle of latticed metal.
"Can you blast through it?" Logan asked Cyclops.
Cyclops shook his head. "Not without tearing the whole arm off," he
replied.
Then suddenly the whir and whoosh of wind could be heard from
above. Cyclops turned his head, following the sound up the stairs;
then he looked back at the others.
"Come on," he told them.
Logan, followed by Cyclops, Storm, and Jean, ran up the narrowing
staircase and into the statue's
crown. They glanced around the small, empty space, then up at the
moon shining through a hole in the top of the head.
"Everybody get out of here," Logan said suddenly. His voice was stiff
and urgent.
The others turned to look at him.
"What's wrong?" Storm asked.
"I can't move."
Then, as the X-Men watched, Logan's hands balled into fists and rose
up to press against his chest. Then with a WHOOMP he flew back
into the wall of the metal head.
The next thing the X-Men knew, the statue's metal bracing was
coming loose all around them. Cyclops blasted away a few of the
braces, but there were too many—and they were coming at them too
fast.
One wrapped itself around Jean and another one wrapped itself
around Cyclops, pinning the couple face-to-face. Two sharp spikes
bent in against Cyclops' temples and locked his head in place. A third
band of metal pinned Storm against the wall. And a forth brace
wrapped around Logan, strapping his fists to his chest and making it
impossible for him to extend his deadly claws without piercing his
own heart.
The X-Men fought in vain against their crushing
shackles ... as Magneto appeared in the sky above them and floated
down into the statue's head.
"Ah, my friends . . . welcome," he said with a sinister grin.
Magneto walked from X-Man to X-Man and inspected their braces
with satisfaction, while behind him Sabretooth landed with a heavy
thud.
Still wearing his Cerebro-proof helmet, Magneto stopped in front of
Cyclops. "You'd best close your eyes," he warned.
He nodded to Sabretooth, and with a happy growl the beast walked
over, tore Cyclops' visor off his face, and dropped it into his vest
pocket.
Cyclops stood helpless and frozen, facing Jean with his eyes shut
tight. Without his shield, his superhuman optic ray would
immediately destroy anything and everything in its sight . . .
beginning with Jean Grey.
Magneto rubbed his hands together with perverse pleasure.
"And you," he said, turning next to Logan. "So glad you could make
it."
"Storm!" Cyclops shouted out angrily. "Fry him."
"By all means," Magneto said, nodding. "A bolt of lightning into a
huge copper conductor . . . that
would be quite effective." He looked over his shoulder at Cyclops and
sneered. "I thought you lived at a school."
Magneto raised his radio to his mouth. "Mystique," he called into it.
He waited a moment for a response. "Mystique, where are you?"
There was no answer.
As Magneto lowered his radio, Jean Grey spoke up.
"You can't do this," she told Magneto. "I've seen Senator Kelly."
"Ah, so the good senator survived his fall? And the swim to shore?"
Magneto looked at her intently as he handed his radio to Sabretooth.
"He's much more powerful than I could have possibly imagined."
"Kelly's deady" Jean answered darkly. "His body couldn't handle the
strain."
Magneto's face fell. "N-no," he stammered, "that's . . ."
For a moment Magneto stood shocked and uncertain. Then he shook
his head. No. It simply wasn't possible. There was no way he could be
wrong about his machine and his master plan. He looked back
bitterly at Jean.
"You're just using one of Xavier's mind games.
Well, it won't work. Why can't you see what I am trying to do?"
Magneto said. "Why do you stand in my way? I am doing this for you.
I am doing this to put an end to the persecution of my people."
"Baloney," Logan barked.
Magneto turned and glared.
"One of your people/' Logan went on, "is about to get fried in your
little machine. I bet she's feeling pretty persecuted, pal. K you were
so righteous, it'd be you in that thing."
"Oh, yes?" Magneto replied, raising his dark eyebrows. "And who
would lead them then? You? Charles Xavier?"
He turned back to Jean. "This is not the time for politics and debate,"
he declared. "It is a time for strength. Our people will need
leadership."
"Sure," Logan broke in again mockingly. "All hail Magneto. King of
the new race and all-around geno-cidal maniac." He sneered. "Hey,
that sounds familiar."
Magneto took an angry step toward Logan and opened his mouth.
But before he could set his opponent straight, the radio crackled to
life behind him. Sabretooth raised it to his furry ear and listened.
"Boss," he said, holding out the radio and turning it up for Magneto.
The scratchy radio voice of a Secret Service agent echoed through the
metal room:
"The house is full. I repeat — The house is full. Proceed to phase
two."
Sabretooth clicked the radio off and slipped it into his pocket. "It's
time," he told Magneto.
The villain nodded and took one long last look at Logan.
"Good-bye, brothers,''' he told his prisoners. Then he levitated off the
floor and floated back out of the hole in the statue's head.
INSIDE THE STATUE OF LIBERn—MINUTES LATER
As Magneto drifted up into the Statue of Liberty's torch, Logan tried
once again to break out of his metal jail. But the braces held him
tight. Outside, a brilliant fireworks show was filling the clear night
sky as part of the opening ceremonies of the summit meeting. The XMen could hear the cheers of the dignitaries drifting up firom Ellis
Island. Little did the world leaders know what fate was really about
to befall them. . . .
Logan noticed Sabretooth moving over toward the bay of windows . .
. and while his guard took in the
awesome display of fire and light, Logan seized the chance to break
free.
He closed his eyes and clenched his teeth . . . and did the
unthinkable.
SHOOK!
Logan's metal claws shot out of his fists and straight through his
chest, then out his back and through the metal bands that bound
him. Logan roared in agony as he pulled his claws back in—^but he
was free.
Sabretooth turned at the sound of Logan's cries. Roaring, with white
fangs bared, he lunged for Logan. But Logan was more than ready.
He kicked Sabretooth in the stomach, then climbed up on his
shoulder and used the mutant's huge body to launch himself out of
the hole.
Standing on the statue's crown, Logan tried to think what to do next.
But Sabretooth was right behind him. Snarling, he leaped out of the
statue's head and plowed into Logan. He picked Logan up over his
head and tossed him like a rag doll, impaling him on one of the
spikes of the crown.
Logan howled in pain and looked up to see Sabretooth charging at
him once again. The angry beast
was ready to finish the fight. But as far as Logan was concerned, their
battle was just beginning.
High above them, Rogue struggled against her bonds in Magneto's
machine. She looked up as Magneto silentiy approached the
machine, and she began to cry.
"No. Please don't do this," she sobbed. "Please."
"I'm sorry, my dear," Magneto replied.
Solemnly the Master of Magnetism removed his leather gloves and
paused a moment to prepare himself for the earth-shattering event
about to occur. He took a step closer to Rogue and cradled her face in
his hands.
FLASH!
Instantly Rogue's tear-filled eyes opened wide . . . and the evil
mutant power of Magneto rushed into her body.
In the next supercharged seconds, the whole of Magneto's past and
present flashed through Rogue's mind. She saw everything he had
ever seen ... all the death and all the horror . . . and for a moment she
could almost understand him.
After he had held on to Rogue as long as he was able. Magneto pulled
his hands away.
At first Rogue slumped back in her handcuffs, dazed. Then suddenly
her hands clamped around the machine's metal handles as if
magnetized. And with a loud ZAP! the machine came to life.
His own power temporarily weakened. Magneto used the little
strength he had left to pull himself out of the machine. And while it
began the process of draining Rogue's new powers, Aiagneto looked
dov^ii from the edge of the torch across the harbor at Ellis Island.
"*Give me your tired, your poor ...,'" he began, reciting the words
from the statue's tablet.
Then he turned toward the bright lights of Manhattan—and its
millions of inhabitants, all within range. . . .
"Tour huddled masses . . .'"
Suddenly the POW! and BLAM! of Logan and Sabretooth's battle
reached Magneto's ears, and he looked down. . . .
"This ... is mine," Logan snarled as his claws slashed through the
chain around Sabretooth's thick neck.
The silvery dog tag flew into his palm and he held it up, panting.
But Sabretooth wasn't fazed. "That all you got?" he laughed. He
grabbed Logan by the scruff of the neck and lifted him up to face
level.
Logan spat in the mutant's yellow cat eyes. Then he thought for a
moment.
Metal skull? he said to himself. Hmm, why not?
He reared his head back and with a solid CRACK! slammed his
forehead into Sabretooth's furry face. There was a sickening
CRUNCH . . . and Sabretooth fell back, stunned.
Logan took a deep breath. With a furious howl, he took a last deadly
swipe at Sabretooth's head—
"Uhhhl"
Before Logan could hit his mark, Sabretooth reached out and
grabbed him by the wrist. He yanked on Logan's arm, and before
Logan could stop him, flung him over his head and over the side of
the statue's spiked crown.
Panting, Sabretooth pulled himself to his feet and slowly peered over
the crown's edge. He sighed. No Logan. No nothing. Then he looked
down at Cyclops' visor resting near his feet. It had fallen out of his
pocket during his hand-to-hand with Logan. One
thing was for sure, he thought. Cyclops wasn't going to need his visor
after tonight. And with a wicked, tooth-filled grin, Sabretooth kicked
the visor off the statue and turned back toward his remaining
prisoners below.
THUD!
Sabretooth's huge, hairy feet landed heavily on the metal floor inside
the statue's head. He looked around at the three X-Men and let his
gaze come to rest on Storm. She, he decided, would be his next
Mwlucky victim.
He walked up to Storm and with a savage growl held up his long,
razor-sharp claw. . . .
But before Sabretooth could slash out, some strong but unseen force
stopped his hand in midair. He turned in angry confusion—to see
Jean Grey staring at his hand with intense concentration.
Sabretooth's evil grin slowly widened. A game of cat and mouse
v^asjust what he was in the mood for. He stretched his other clawed
hand out toward Jean's thin neck . .. and felt it stopped once again by
Jean's telekinesis.
But Sabretooth's smile only got wider. With deranged determination,
he forced his hand to move forward . . . farther and farther . . . until it
finally reached Jean's neck and slowly wrapped around it.
Though his eyes were still closed, Cyclops could hear Jean just inches
away firom him, struggling to breathe. But there was nothing he
could do. There was no way to stop Sabretooth—
"Hey."
Sabretooth whipped around and his startled jaw dropped open.
Logan!
He had used his claws to grab hold of the statue's ear and climb back
to the crown. And though he was beaten and bleeding, he was ready
to make Sabretooth pay.
The vicious mutant instantly let go of Jean and turned his full fury on
Logan. But Logan was ready. His eyes shifted to meet Jean's.
"What do you see?" he asked her.
As she gasped for air, Jean let her telepathic powers read his mind.
"Scott," she said quickly, "when I tell you—open your eyes."
"What?" Cyclops blurted out.
"I know. I know what you're thinking," she told him. "But there's no
other way."
"Jean, I can't. You'll be killed—"
"You have to," Jean said firmly. "Scott . . . trust me.
Meanwhile, Logan, with one hand behind his back, glared at
Sabretooth. "I'm not finished with you yet," he growled.
He whipped his hand around and held up Cyclops' mirrored visor.
"Drop something?" he asked, enjoying the dismayed look on
Sabretooth's face. Then he tossed the visor into the air and waited for
Jean's mind to freeze it in midair, pull it across the room, and stop it
in front of Cyclops' face.
"Now," Jean commanded.
Reluctantly Cyclops obeyed her and opened his eyes. Instandy whitehot energy surged into the visor, where it was focused in the lens and
—
BOOM!
Cyclops' optic blast hit Sabretooth hke a freight train, sending him
flying through the statue's forehead like a bullet from a gun.
Sabretooth was history. But the X-Men's job had just begun. As
Logan cut Storm loose and helped Jean and Cyclops out of their
splintered braces, dense white light was already starting to flow from
Magneto's machine.
"I've gotta blast it," Cyclops said, adjusting his red crystal visor.
Lx)gan grabbed him by the arm. "Not with Rogue in there!" he
shouted. He turned to Storm. "I need you to blow me up there. Right
now."
Storm shook her head. "I can't control it like that. You could fly right
over the torch."
"If I don't make it," Logan said grimly, "then he can blast the thing.
But just do it.""
At that moment Rogue's tortured shrieks tore through their metal
chamber. Storm looked up through the hole at the vile machine. And
when her face turned back to Logan, her eyes were milky white.
Storm waved her delicate hand, and instantly the air whipped into a
cyclone. Cyclops, Jean, and even Storm were blown against the walls
—^but Logan stayed where he was, in the center of the storm, and
waited for it to carry him up out of the statue's head.
At a speed of hundreds of miles per hour, the tornado took Logan
higher and higher. He nearly flew over the statue, but at the last
second he managed to launch himself into the machine.
SHOOK!
Logan extended both sets of claws and dove into the spinning ring,
claws first. They sheared through the thick metal as Logan tried to
wrap himself protectively around Rogue's body . . . but the machine
still wasn't stopping.
Fueled by the awesome magnetic power now in Rogue, the blinding
light from the machine kept on pouring out. Like a growing,
unstoppable bubble, it spread out firom the statue, across the water,
bearing down on both Manhattan and Ellis Island.
At first the World Summit guests thought it was all part of the
ceremonial light show. But as the cloud of pure light grew . . . and
grew . . . their delight turned to fear.
Rogue screamed into Logan's arms as the machine built to full
power. But the damage Logan had done to it had thrown it off
balance. The ring wobbled and swung wildly—and as Magneto
looked on in horror from the torch balcony, the ring collided into the
platform with a deafening boom.
At once the giant wall of impenetrable light collapsed and
disappeared . . . and everything—and everyone—^was quiet.
Painfully Logan picked himself up from the wreckage and looked
down at Rogue. She was pale and unconscious, and a white streak
was now visible in her hair. Her hands were still bound to poles of
the crumpled machine, but before he could tend to her, there was
one more mess he had to clean up. He leaped off the flame platform
and onto the torch balcony.
Magneto looked up as soon as he heard Logan and weakly waved his
hand. Bits and pieces of broken machine flew through the air toward
Logan. But Logan effortlessly clawed through them. He strode up to
Magneto and grabbed him by the collar. Then he raised his fist and—
SHOOK!—prepared his claws for the kill. He looked down at
Magneto with all the rage and hatred of a lifetime . . . but for some
reason that he couldn't explain or understand, he couldn't follow
through.
SHOOK!
His claws shot back in and he threw a simple—but hard—punch at
Magneto instead. The villain's head whipped back, and his heavy
helmet went sailing off, far, far into the distance.
Wiping his hands, Logan climbed back up to Rogue.
"All right, kid," he said gently as he pulled bits of wreckage away.
"Let's . . ." Logan stopped and his voice trailed away. Rogue was
gone, he slowly realized. Not unconscious, but gone . . .
He knelt beside her, not knowing what to do. Then he looked down
at his own mortal wounds. He touched one gash in his chest and
winced from the shooting pain. He knew that even his superhealing
ability would have a hard time repairing this.
From below, Logan could hear the radio calls and thumping engines
of boats headed for the island. He didn't have much time before the
statue would be crawling with 5>Jew York police. He looked down at
Rogue and realized what he could—^what he must do. And calmly he
took her face in his bare hands and waited for her power to take from
him the life he had left.
THE X-MANSION—DAYS LATER
In the cool sterile light of the X-Laboratory, Jean Grey looked down
at the awakening figure before her.
"Welcome back," she said warmly. "I knew you'd find your way."
Professor X looked back at her and smiled. "I had you to guide me,"
he replied. He took a quiet breath. "So," he went on, "how did we
do?"
Jean's face grew dark. She turned and the professor followed her
eyes to another lab bed . . . where Logan lay hooked up to dozens of
tubes and blinking monitors.
Jean shook her head. "He's not healing."
Professor X nodded, understanding. "My chair, please," he said to
Jean. He knew what he had to do.
Professor X wheeled himself to Logan's bed and placed a hand on his
pale forehead. Slowly the images in Lx)gan's brain began to filter into
his own.
"Logan," the professor said sofdy, "tell me what happened to you."
Quietly Jean walked past the blipping monitors and up to Logan's
bed.
His wounds had healed, but he was still weak. She reached out to
check the largest bandage on his chest. .. and to her surprise felt a
gentle hand grasp hers.
"Hey," Logan breathed weakly.
Jean smiled back at him. "Hey. How are you feeling?"
"Fantastic," Logan groaned, wincing through a wave of pain.
"That was a brave thing you did," Jean said.
Logan lifted his head eagerly. "Did it work?"
Jean nodded. "She's fine. She took on a few of your more charming
personality traits for a while,
but we lived through it." Her mouth turned up playfully. "I think
she's a little taken with you."
"Well," Logan said, leaning back with a sigh, "you can tell her my
heart belongs to someone else."
Jean looked at him awkwardly. "You know," she began, "you and I^"
Logan cut her off. "How's Xavier doing?" he asked.
Jean smiled. "He's good."
Logan smiled back and nodded. "Good."
By the end of the week Logan's body had healed and he was ready to
be on his own again. He had given Professor X all the time he'd
promised . . . and this roommate thing just wasn't his style.
He joined the professor in the map room, where a different scene
was now displayed on the table. This one was almost all mountains,
snow-covered and steep.
As Logan walked up to study it. Professor X pointed to a high
mountain pass. "There is an abandoned military compound at Alkali
Lake, in the Canadian Rocky Mountains, not far from where we
found you. There's not much left of it, but you may find some
answers."
Logan stared at the map for a long time, taking it in.
"Thank you," he said finally.
"You know there's always a place for you here," Professor X told him.
Lx)gan nodded. "I know."
The professor grasped the arms of his chair. "Are you going to say
good-bye to them?" he asked.
Logan took a deep breath. "No," he said.
Within days the mood at the X-Mansion had turned triumphant.
"Even after last week's terrorist attack on the Statue of Liberty by an
unidentified mutant organization, the outcome of the Senate vote
was fifty to forty-nine in opposition to the Mutant Registration Act."
"Hurray!''
The TV room erupted into a chorus of cheers as Cyclops, Jean,
Storm, and a group of students heard the anchorman's good news.
"Quiet. Quiet, everybody," Cyclops called.
"Many feel that this narrow defeat was due in large part to the
disappearance of Senator Robert
Kelly, who until today provided the loudest voice in the cry for
Mutant Registration. . . ."
That afternoon Logan cleaned out his room and his locker and
walked through the X-Mansion for the last time. He closed the front
door solidly behind him and walked down the front steps . . . where
he found Cyclops' motorcycle sitting in the middle of the driveway.
The keys were in the ignition.
Logan reached out and pulled off a note that was taped to the gas
tank.
"Good luck — Scott" it read.
Logan smiled and slipped the piece of paper into his jacket pocket.
He climbed onto the gleaming bike and jumped on the kick-start.
VA-ROOM!
The bike came alive beneath him with a deep, powerful rumble, and
Logan took off toward the highway.
Then he turned the bike around.
Rogue was playing kickball with some other kids from the school
when Logan pulled up beside the
yard. She heard his motor, turned around, and ran smiling toward
the bike.
Logan put out a gloved hand and grasped hers tightly. "Take care of
yourself," he told her as he gently let go.
Rogue looked down to see Logan's dog tag resting in her palm. And
when she looked up, her eyes were filled with tears.
"Thank you," she said hoarsely. She knew the words hardly
expressed how truly grateful she was to him. But she had a feeling
that he knew.
Logan smiled at her awkwardly and nodded. Then he sat back on his
bike, gunned the engine, and pulled away.
A SMAU ROOM-SOME TIME LATER
"Doesn't it ever wake you in the middle of the night?"
The Master of Magnetism looked up at his opponent as he moved his
knight across the chessboard.
"The feeling that someday, someday very soon, they will pass that
foolish law—or one just like it— and they will come for you and your
children? Take you all away?"
Professor X sat back in his chair and nodded heavily. "It does indeed,
Eric."
"And what do you do when you wake up to that?"
The professor stared into Magneto's deep, troubled eyes. "I feel a great swell of pity for the poor soul who comes to
that school looking for trouble."
Then he moved his queen into check position. Magneto quickly
countered. And Professor X moved again.
"You know this is a war, Charles," Magneto said. His pawn moved
across the black square as he spoke. "And I intend to fight it by any
means necessary."
"And I will always be there, old friend," the professor replied. And
with that, he gently knocked Magneto's knight away. "Checkmate,"
he said.
The two men looked at each other—in their game as in life, they were
old friends on opposite sides of the same battle.
"Good-bye, Eric," Professor X said. Then he reached for the plastic
controls on his plastic armrest and wheeled his plastic chair toward
the plastic door. The clear Plexiglas panel slid open before him.
"Why do you come here, Charles?" Magneto called after him.
Professor X smiled. "Why do you ask me questions to which you
already know the answers?"
Magneto rolled his eyes. "Ah, yes . . . your continuing search for
hope." He paused and looked longingly at his friend. "It could have been our world, Charles."
"It's always been our world, Eric," Professor X told him. "It's only
when we lose sight of that that we imprison ourselves."
He rolled out of Magneto's specially made prison room and let the
door slide shut behind him.
And for another day, at least, the world was safe for man . . . and
mutant.
IT'S THE MOVIE EVENT OP THE YEAH^
AND THE ACTION-PACKED BOOK
YOU'VE BEEN WAITING FOR.
Outcasts from society, the X-MEN ore genetic mutations, born with
superhuman powers, who harness their special abilities for the
greater good. But the human race they fight to protect rejects and
fears—even hates—them.
Not all mutants seek to protect mankind. One terrorist group—led by
the supremely powerful Magneto—will seek to strike first. Battling
against prejudice and agents of intolerance, the X-MEN must
establish a peaceful coexistence between mutant and mankind or
they will surely perish . . .
Mow a rnaior blocUnister from Twentieth Century Fox
U.
The official movie novel from Del Rey Books! ^
© 2000 Twentieth Century Fox Film Corporation. All rights
reserved. X-MEN character likenesses: TM © 2000 Marvel
characters. Inc. All rights reserved.

This book made available by the Internet Archive.
